It's okay, I still love you.
We have to water our *house*.
Just the right amount was altered, and omitted in my opinion. The black freighter book within a book wouldn't have worked at all, and the graphic novel's ending would have seemed really silly. I was kind of upset when Hollis Mason's death wasn't in the original cut, but I guess they had to keep the movie under four hours long. The truth is this that Watchmen is an incredibly challenging movie to make. They had to compromise on a lot of stuff and it still turned out really damned good.
Thanks for posting this.  I thought I recognized her stuff from Moonrise Kingdom.
Hello! I am a bot who posts transcriptions of Quickmeme links for anybody who might need it. &gt;Title: My confession &gt;Meme: Confession Bear &gt;* BAD JOKE EEL  &gt;* CRACKS ME UP &gt;^[[Direct](http://i.qkme.me/3pxbjf.jpg)] ^[[Background](http://imgur.com/v6cjv)] ^[[Translate](http://translate.google.com/#auto||BAD+JOKE+EEL+-+CRACKS+ME+UP)] See the [FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/comments/o426k/faq_for_the_qkme_transcriber_bot/) for more info.  (OP: You don't need to do anything differently next time, I'm just doing my job.)
San Francisco is beginning stop and frisk activities. They are also installing cameras in transit stations that identify potential threats based on nothing but body language, and the microphones that monitor speech. It isn't contained to a region or city, this is the future of this country and the world.  Oh look, a military post on the frontpage, yeah! r/guns should be r/LEO, btw. 
no idea honestly. High 20s probably. 
Austin Daye is not that good. God we are awful. Hopefully our young guys step up. 
I try to avoid reading Youtube comments as much as possible. Truly nasty stuff is written there. It'll be interesting to see what they do.
Before Heroin, my bother/bud great guy.  After, with his pos heroin addicted gf, steals from everyone including me.  Neither one can keep a job and when they do get money goes to more heroin or pills.
Hello! I am a bot who posts transcriptions of Quickmeme links for anybody who might need it. &gt;Title: EVERY TIME somebody posts a n.s.f.w link anywhere &gt;* NOT SURE IF NSFW LINK IS SOMETHING SEXY  &gt;* OR SOMETHING ABSOLUTELY TERRIFYING &gt;^[[Direct](http://i.qkme.me/3pxb1s.jpg)] ^[[Background](http://imgur.com/8WooN)] ^[[Translate](http://translate.google.com/#auto||NOT+SURE+IF+NSFW+LINK+IS+SOMETHING+SEXY+-+OR+SOMETHING+ABSOLUTELY+TERRIFYING)] See the [FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/comments/o426k/faq_for_the_qkme_transcriber_bot/) for more info.  (OP: You don't need to do anything differently next time, I'm just doing my job.)
Nice [Stupendous Man](http://imgur.com/wq7e2) in the background.
Reread the original post please.
beatport.com or thatnewjam.com or thatsongissick.com
Hm, 22g? That doesn 't sound like much, let's convert to ounces. *mumbling* Okay, that comes out to about...3/4 of an ounce. Holy shit! That's a lotta weed!
* (0) = Sober * (1) = Had your first drink, you don't really feel anything yet * (2) = Drinks are starting to settle in, but you still don't feel any different. * (3) = You are tipsy, you want to talk to a lot of people * (4) = You are slightly buzzed, but still not ready to be fully involved with the party. You will talk with people and laugh a lot * (5) = You are buzzed. You are having a really great time and everyone else is too * (6) = You start to think about maybe not having another drink. You know that if you keep going, there will be no turning back. * (7) = You feel like you are going to throw up. If your friends want to keep drinking, you will continue to drink with them however. * (8) = You just want to get into a circle with a bunch of people and sing songs such as piano man and free bird. You also want food, a lot of food * (9) = You don't really know what is going on and you want to hit something. That girl over there definitely wants to bang you. That table can support your full weight. * (10) = You will not consciously be able to know you are at this stage, you will wake up the next day with a terrible hangover, probably vomit, and will not remember at least two hours of the previous night   For some reason, it was a lot easier to write this in reverse
Haha That's what I normally do when I run out of ideas or want to be different. Like a tv cabinet on the beach. But it was more or less an example of "finding your own thing."
It's very busy, the banner really isn't doing it for me and I don't feel great about the font choice or the font color. I also think there's a really large disconnect between the banner and the rest of the site, which is fairly simple. 
1265
The apartment was nice, in a perfect spot, very close to all my favorite bars in walking distance. I wasn't gonna leave that and let his slobbery ass keep it, so I got his ass outta there.
The Neo-cons are driven by a handful of nations worldwide that provide financial incentive and partnership to the US. Israel is but one of those. Claiming we will become a "slave state" to Israel is somewhat laughable and unlikely. Or perhaps you have a unique definition of 'slave state'?
Anyone else notice how the avatars seems to have a cycle of Fire -&gt; Air -&gt; Water -&gt; Earth?  Or am I just one of the last ones to notice?
This all looks horrible on my phone
Mandatory participation? No, that's the same tactics the Mafia used to use. The unions suck the life an profitability out of a company.  You simply cannot force me to pay a 3rd party in order to be employed by a State. Pay me or no job??? That's extortion. Unions were needed back in the late 1800's in order for the employees to not be abused by their employer. Now, unions are greedy, self serving entities only worried about keeping themselves in power. Top labor union leaders are making a half million dollars per year! Funny, they cry about the 1% when they are part of it. 
Clicked that link,  and the 2nd definition just goes against what you are saying.
You might be a bad person.  Should probably get that checked out.
You can certainly get a grad degree in the U.S. for free, and in fact you can be paid a pretty good stipend (~$24-30k/year), especially if you are doing a Ph.D.  Check out the [ASEE fellowship site](http://www.asee.org/fellowship-programs/graduate) and look into the SMART and NDSEG fellowships. SMART has a year for year work requirement at a government lab after college, NDSEG has no work requirement but is harder to get.  Most professors also hire graduate student research assistants (GSRAs) that they will pay for, both with a stipend and for tuition. If you are GSRA, your research/thesis topic will typically have to be in line with a professor's research area, and likely for a specific grant that they have written. If you hook up with a professor early, they can also write a grant ahead of time and try to secure funding for you before you start grad school.  A lot of the larger schools will also have other departmental funding opportunities to get you through your first year, or if your fellowship doesn't go long enough.
You're welcome!
i dont understand why people respond or care about the responses to that old ass copy pasta.
A feast worthy of kings!  The sigil would be a rat making a stew with a crown on it's head. 
&gt;There's huge money to be made if pot were legalized  And there is huge money to be made if pot is kept illegal - like for Medical Marijuana Dispensaries.  http://reason.com/blog/2012/04/16/why-medical-marijuana-providers-are-oppo
Your lessons are cheap.   Your insurance is cheap.   wtf Glasgow
Higher power, sure. God? Nah. Just because they're in mythology doesn't make them actual gods. Besides, didnt you hear Stark call Thor a demi-god?
Ah, hope you have fun with the mod! :)
Purposely trying to make a friend feel isolated "as a joke" is terrible, and wouldn't be funny to anyone but you and Emilee. It's not surprising that your prank backfired.
Blade Runner (1982) Children of Men (2006)
tea flavored sugar water
I had a student who talked about this one in her final, and it sounded like a must-read. I'll have to put it on the list.
And I restored yours. The circle is complete.
Incorrect, you will find that this shape is quite excellent aerodynamically speaking, with the possible exception of the windscreen. 
States with a history of drought/limited water supplies have a complicated system of water rights.   [Colorado Utah and other states in the Southwest place limits on rainwater harvesting.](http://www.ncsl.org/issues-research/env-res/rainwater-harvesting.aspx)
Are you sure they didn't try to drunk you up so they could collect information about the US? &amp; Then once taken, they plot an evil scam to blow us up? 
Khakis of Defense, natch.
Your post does not match the title format for this subreddit. Please follow this exact format:  **[H] What you have [W] What you want**  Note that spaces are important.  This post has been removed - feel free to fix your title and resubmit.  Please see the [FAQ](http://redd.it/quw61) and [format guide](http://redd.it/sw72u) for more information.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%23SteamGameSwap) if you have any questions or concerns.*
&lt;sarcasm&gt;Wow! What a perfectly constructed statement.&lt;/sarcasm&gt; If you disagree with my statement try to actually argue the point instead of resorting to ad hominem.  Did you even read my response?  &gt; It wasn't directed solely at OP  I was making a statement for immigrants in general. 
True story, something similar happened to me.  I queue'd up for ranked, but needed a shit. I got my tablet pc out and used a remote access app to connect to my pc so I could pick my champ from the toilet. :&gt;
Moutinho and Ozil have not played up to Balotelli's level. Nor have De Rossi or Busquets. I'll give you Alba, Pirlo, Iniesta and Pepe.   You'll find those that put the ball in the back of the net in the most spectacular of fashion, in the most important games are more easily remembered than others. I don't think it has anything to do with hype. Nobody was really hyping him before the tournament.
Probably not a good idea to flirt with **HIGH SCHOOL BOYS** on your **WORK** phone.
Maybe she wants help with the rent, etc., but is too embarrassed to admit it or doesn't want to make you feel bad for not being able to provide for your new life.
I'll start with the favorites:  Primer, but be warned it's fairly technical and may be unintelligible the first 3 times you watch it. Memento is another must watch. Inception, the Prestige, Oldboy, Death Note (The live action was iffy, but be ok if you haven't seen the series.  I'll add a few more in a bit.
I could never live in Idaho because there isnt a good variety in types of food available. I like having Thai, Vietnamese, Mexican, Greek, Indian, Chinese, Japanese, Jamaican, and tons of other authentic tasting ethnic food! ahah You gotta move out here bro! Plus the bud is really good out here! ahahh
All the rest have 31,  save February alone, which has 28 rain or shine,  and on leap-year, 29.   - Calendar Man
That's the stupidest assumption I have ever heard. If you were a normal person I would naturally assume you are joking, but since you associate yourself with SRS I can't automatically assume that.   I live in Houston. Enough said. 
I call bullshit. But have an upvote anyways.
It's safe if you declare `salary` as [thread local](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Thread-local_storage#C.2B.2B).
I'd like every champion to be free.
Those rat bastards...
Madea Goes To Mars 
"Don't say sex, say flying."
Freaks and Geeks. My So-Called Life.
A public link on a Dropbox account?
That was my theory, lots and lots of yummy face licks!
For those not on FB, here's the website:  http://www.welcomehomeiraqveterans.org/  HOWEVER, getting the FB event page viral would really help us spread the word, so PLEASE RSVP and invite your friends!
Maybe it is a little bit of the 4chan rules. But I think it actually goes a little bit deeper.  Note: I may be making some generalizations here, but you get the point.  Before the days of Facebook, Twitter, 4G connections and high speed internet (before it was all that popular outside of commercial use) most personal internet users were geeky and nerdy. They enjoyed computers for a lot of the same reasons we do, freedom to be ourselves, anonymity, expression and acceptance from peers. Think of some of the first BBS, forums and IRCs. When you think of users for those sites, you think of sweaty, greasy basement dwellers. We've all seen the stereotype in movies (e.g. Dennis Nedry of Jurassic Park). Part of what drew some of these types of people to the internet was the fact that they WEREN'T popular. They were "socially awkward". For them, using the computer was a form of "escape" or a way to connect with like-minded people from all over the world.  Nowadays, we have a way of forgetting the social stigma that was attached to being-into-computers. I believe that this social stigma is partially behind why certain internet users feel afraid to express their interest in such sites as Reddit, 4chan, tumblr etc. At the time, you didn't want people knowing you were some sort of computer nerd. It wouldn't have been worth the extra social stigma in real life.  But it mostly presents itself in older users, people from the days of Somethingawful, Slashdot, BBS, IRCs etc. To these people, the internet was "theirs". It was for the computer geeks, the internet nerds. I would go so far as to say they feel like most mainstream users and encroaching on "their territory". Enternal September comes to mind, but that's a wholly different discussion.  Let's visit 4Chan's infamous rules 1 and 2. Your personal stance on them only existing for raids, or being impermeable laws or that they don't really exist notwithstanding; they do provide that insight into not wanting other people to know about "their site". We've all seen the infamous pissing contests between "oldfags" and "newfags" on the site. It boils down to the fact that based upon how long you've been at the site the more entitled you are to it. People look down on new users oftentimes because they don't read the rules, use poor grammar, don't conform to the norms, etc. So site users would oftentimes not want additional people coming to their site for those reasons. Vaguely reminiscent of "hipster-ism". "I was using this site before it was cool" -Internet Hipster.  But let's not forget how the internet has exploded in the past few decades. From 16 million in 1995 to 361 million users in 2000 to 938 million in 2005 to over 2.2 billion users today. And these new users AREN'T the geeky nerdy types. You've got the 12 year old on an iPad to Grandpa Joe using his Windows 98 machine. All these new users don't know the rules, they aren't the nerdy types. Longtime users may feel a bit "encroached" upon.  To some it up as best I can; longtime users are subconsciously or consciously trying to avoid social stigma of internet use or feel like the internet is entitled to them.  TL;DR Awkward internet hipster nerds butt-hurt over too many new users.
Louisina loves getting shit on by big corporations. 
Mike maddoxs facial hair looks like both of his lips have mustaches. 
First off, the 2 sites you need are http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Doctor_who_episodes (episode list) and dailymotion.com (has almost all Classic Who. Secondly, know that the classics are much longer, each story (or serial) is generally 4 25 minute long episodes.  *minor spoilers ahead* As for where, I recommend starting where I started, "Spearhead from Space" The Third Doctor's first story. It's a unique time in Doctor Who because The Doctor is stuck on Earth for quite awhile starting from this episode. Plus The Master shows up for the first time early in his run. The reason I don't recommend starting at the very beginning is because a lot of episodes from the First and Second Doctors are missing. Do check out the first episode "An Unearthly Child" though.   Or you could just look at a picture of all the classic Doctors, pick one and start at his episode 1.
It's SUPER effective!!* ...
I'm the same as IamTheBrainOfMe, I just chose the highest level that I can beat semi regularly. They don't really mean all that much though.
I have the same problem with the songs super freak and can't touch this 
Always respond anyway.  Who gives a fuck?  If the status is visible to you, it's fair game in my book.
I just saw it. Only thing that bugged me... didn't clear the bowl once. Come on!
I think they wanted to show the table setup as part of the whole picture.
Also throws out butter churner patent claim.
Worst part after the pants dropped was where the TSA agent snickered and noted "Captain Kirk, you gots Klingons around yo ass!" He then proceeded to steal Shatner's wallet.
I'm sorry, but you cant afford it? It's like 10 bucks.
You're doing it wrong.
Ok, lemme just breed them up, any preferences?
Of course they wouldnt stop selling the product unless they were legally obligated to! now you look at the quote and tell me which part is incorrect. Now the last part, its clearly going over your head; the point is even though they are not OBLIGATED to license out patents which i am well aware of they still should have. Samsung is trying to get Apple to play fair and pay for licensing whilst Apple is refusing to even offer licensing for their patents. Its the end results that theyre going for that i have a problem with. edit: just thought i'd make you go ape shit mad for a minute hahaha ;]
dd   dd  dd
It's hard to get into, and full of garbage.  Not much good urban exploration in Montreal these days, the o'keefe brewery used to be a lot of fun, they left it full of old brewing equipment, books, logs, everything was intact.
He did!  It's also borderline "DAE breathe."  Of course people exist who don't like cats.  What the hell.  Post removed.
People have been saying that since 2009. But you're right. This run can't last forever 
Every champ I don't have yet. They're all 6300 except for Swain.
Well he is a peasant. He should know his place... His only job is to put job pay back into the economy!
&gt;No. The history of optometry and modeling goes between the United States was probably that to explore them to people. Growth toward fashion fair. This, thousands of people as a class plain, and the first house monk, the oldest by survey data of the 1930s is widely of the wife and husband who may have been paid in China, in 1930. But we had study of the optical system of the previous 1300 years as is more common in the power of the British citizen mark bad fashion model, in 1000, to 60 yesterday which was pointed at a picture of history. Data from the German models in 1852, is 1950 a ton of shrimp to cover the cost point, polo, in the opinion of marriage was created. Mila Kunis here in the first of the importance of scientific pursuit in the amount of description was the start date in 1305 photo at the end of the neck vanity in the model which is the life my glasses. Anonymous physics invents a name travel package, but we have a large display in China by 1940, 20 Lee, Needham, Italy, branches, the second half of the first costs it is not. The second hand called in between points. In addition, sufficient super lens image vogue, also conducted in Paris, in time the recognition of supermodel status, was the attitude of designer images the worksheet mode, extended during the war. Thus in the famous city of its creation many years in one year do not need the absolute origin model for the way optometry, with his art. Stand still, his eyes, a scientist from Venice found an unknown future history of early 1950s, he said. Glossier eyes so that face direction of Italy, as well as decorative in serial media, bent eyes, the world has not been heard from the Netherlands models.  Huh?!  This post deserves its own WTF thread.
I was told the same thing. [This](http://www.straightdope.com/columns/read/1560/whats-the-meaning-of-jesus-teaching-about-the-camel-going-through-the-eye-of-a-needle) should straighten all that out for you. Spoiler alert: its not true. 
Have fun at the Pelican Lounge and play nice with the flight students, they are going to be everywhere.
is this in san ysidro?
IF you've tried talking to them, and the landlords and nothing is being done, you'll either have to suck it up until your lease is up or move if you can afford it. Apartments suck !
Every. Single. Fucking. Night. 
Not sure what their point was, I was just educating you that it is. 
Prostitutes can be expensive.
I would play it "more" because I would actually play it at all, instead of not paying or playing it. I worded that weird, my bad.
Nice try zombie, but you're not getting MY brain.
I feel offended by that. I once saw a nigga, he was black.
Not sure what frame size I need.. I'm 6'1".  Don't have much experience on a road bike, figure I'd get around faster on one though. I'm in Absecon / Pleasantville / Galloway area if any of the others on here look good.  I really have no idea what I'm looking at.   Also considering this one:   http://southjersey.craigslist.org/bik/3065514472.html
How is any random medical doctor going to definitively determine whether a woman is being coerced or not? That rule is completely illogical.
when you see it...
Gotta say I'm liking these grandma ones.
IF you've tried talking to them, and the landlords and nothing is being done, you'll either have to suck it up until your lease is up or move if you can afford it. Apartments suck !
onlieee 90ss kidzzz will Cri evere tim &lt;333333 xxx
Too many things to list, let's just put it that way. 
That was the best thing I ever read.
[Implants](http://xmb.stuffucanuse.com/xmb/image.php?&amp;aid=2242&amp;ab-implants.jpg)
BORING
Actually, it does.
Same here. I love my wahoo
Looks like it probably crosses the line in the very last second of the video. But you're right, if it was a goal, it was also a foul.
Cyprus is in two time zones.  /shittyaskscience
EJ EJ EJ i dont care what people say about you
I think that the holocaust is used by Jews as something sacred, no it is not. It is death, it is the same for everyone, not just the Jews. Exterminations have happen throughout history, some for hundreds of years and not just for 12 years. To say that it is something special is to elevate it into some sort of undeserved victimhood, being a victim brings one status and sympathy and also the stick to beat others who don't share the views of some Jews.
What exactly *is* a sincerely hole? 
Or maybe it's witchcraft, and he's under a magic spell!!
I know that feel sis. *hugs*  But you're really pretty, and the freckles are adorabubble!
so no, yes? 
But liberals deny the Holocaust, at least according to what you consider to be valid generalization. You seem to be liberal, so why do you deny the Holocaust?  Liberals deny the Holocaust, right? I bet there are FAR more liberals that deny the Holocaust than Conservatives who claim Roberts was high on epilepsy meds. Does that make my statement accurate and non-sensationalist according to you?
Make the grudge noise back down the phone if they call
Yo***YOLO***gist
We have meetups in /r/lubbock. You should join the subreddit.
That's the point of the banner. The revolution is OVER. See it now? 
I pretty much used only Swampert the first time i played Gen. 3
I am, too.  I'm just not a douchebag who feels the need to use racial slurs in an attempt to annoy people.
How do I display with clothes on?
Bath salts!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
I know there's a company that makes big UV resistant vinyl stickers for advertising.  I'm sure it'd wouldn't cost more than a grand.  I'm trying to imagine my neighbor's reaction.
What did you expect?
I understand the SR-2 (or perhaps their omnitools) had something akin to voicechat, never seen them use a textchat interface tough.
http://www.theatlantic.com/politics/archive/2011/07/the-chart-that-should-accompany-all-discussions-of-the-debt-ceiling/242484/
I do not think any of those would be recognizable after 100,000 years.  I really do not think the list is very big of what would last. 
Only reasons it throws me off is that it has the DX graphics and doesn't quite feel like some other other gummy champions I've seen, hen again they do vary a lot. As for having the DX graphic, I've just come to accept that there is no way it is DX even with the pretty picture. Got the disc for 6 bucks and can throw it with a light hyzer flip all day long. 
actually pretty faithful, some side storylines are cut out (but you see the characters involved in them at points) and a detail about the ending is changed to fit the reduced elements of the adaptation; but otherwise it's pretty close. It's clear that the people who made the movie had a reverance for the comic, which is admirable even if it was a so-so movie.
After getting in line to put all of my stuff through the scanner conveyor belt, they pulled me out of line to go through the evil, dreaded "see-you-naked" scanner. They told me to just leave my things there to be scanned.  Had to stand in a line to get wand-searched, then had to stand in line to go through said dreaded scanner. Then had to wait after that to be patted down.   By the time I was back to the end of the conveyor belt, where my poor backpack had been waiting for about 15 minutes, the laptop was nowhere to be found.   I told them it was gone, and asked them to help me find it. Nope. Not a chance. Just a blank stare.   I started looking around. My brothers and my mom were looking too. Then I realized it had been stolen. It was nowhere to be found.   I threw a FIT. I am not one to raise my voice, or cause a ruckus, and usually I just let everything slide. But this was different. Because they had to be ridiculous with their dumb old scanner, my laptop had been stolen. So I started demanding they find it, or they were going to buy me a new one.   Then, probably because of my state of hysteria, they pulled me to the side, and told me they were now going to have to search my bags because I was causing a scene. So I had to stand there and wait while they went through every single pocket, while my laptop thief was surely long gone.   As this is going on, my mom is calling my dad very concerned because I'm so upset, and they've never seen me like that (haha). My brother starts looking for it.   He found it at another TSA conveyor belt station like 5 stations down. There were only 2 open, and the other 2-3 were shut down. It had been taken and stowed in a drawer there by itself. He opened the drawer and found it, and came back with it.   CLEARLY, TSA tried to steal my laptop while I was playing scanner-puppet. 
The amount of emoticons in this thread is too damn high!
Nice.
Distribution is a joke. I hope REX and AB at least give it a trial run in the beginning to field the market. I'm here on the coast so I think I have better odds than most areas of the state.
If they're a friend, it's not random. Plus, you can delete your tax file after using it.
I listen to NPR too!
How much?
Uhm, what? &gt;Stuart cited, against that Obama allegation, Glenn Kessler, “The Fact Checker,” at the Washington Post, who, on 25 May 2012, said that, “Under Obama, ... federal spending as a percentage of the U.S. economy ... has hit highs not seen since the end of World War II,” partly as “the result of a sustained higher level of spending.” But this statement was itself silly: How could these “highs” be anything else than a “higher level of spending”? That’s what they were, if they existed at all (which they did). So, they weren’t “the result” of those “highs,” such as Kessler said, they were those highs. Then, Kessler tried to seem like the phony objective “On the one hand, ... but on the other hand” type of person, by his saying, “Part of this, of course, is a consequence of the recession,” which was itself outright false: It was instead a response to the “recession.” For example, in Europe, spending is being cut while the depression rolls on. Their response to the depression is “austerity,” not spending (such as with Obama). An economic depression does not cause government spending to go up; that can – and there it does – go down. **So, yet again, “The Fact Checker” was simply false.**  What the hell does this mean?? How has the author demonstrated that the fact checker is false about the statement that spending as a percentage of the economy is very very high in the Obama administration.  The author seems to simply quibble with how the fact checker phrased it.  After demolishing the phrasing, the author asserts that the fact checker is wrong.  Help me out here guys, is this just really bad writing or should I go ahead and enroll in a reading comprehension course?
Please link to a picture of the Stussy logo that looks like this. None of those do.
"How could they make us wait to see this?!?!"  Lol. Bitches be crazy
This is a really old copypasta, usually featuring a leprechaun.
I might come on to your server now.
Yeah, I noticed that after i posted my comment :/
Let me pose the question this way.  It will be based on assumptions.  You and I live in a world where we both agree that there should be no war.  Current tribal views fracture our common understanding that war is bad, allowing war.  If you and I, though we may agree that war is bad, do not have a common outlet to make our belief a reality, our feeling, our belief becomes moot.  ???  
Make sure to check out the little Tiki totems strewn in the sand outside the giant monkey head.
I think that the holocaust is used by Jews as something sacred, no it is not. It is death, it is the same for everyone, not just the Jews. Exterminations have happen throughout history, some for hundreds of years and not just for 12 years. To say that it is something special is to elevate it into some sort of undeserved victimhood, being a victim brings one status and sympathy and also the stick to beat others who don't share the views of some Jews.
Mmm, good, now you can walk away with the pride of having taken the high road, right? But you still haven't addressed a single thing I've said. You've just stuck with an ad hom line and desperately avoided *actually* engaging in a conversation about the problems with your faith. You're the worst kind of person in the world, and I hope you're aware of that.  In any case, it always feels good to employ a bit of polemics against somebody like you, with your head so far up your own ass you can't see the light of day.
Boy do I have the [extremely relevant dubstep](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=aOuxvwyIeIY) for you...
All I can see there is Atari
You are awesome, and absolutely did the right thing.
Alright fine. For the karma
Ong. who the fuck is Ong?
Wow.  Good thing you're not a dude, or you'd have quit OKC forever ago. Another option that people (sort of) haven't mentioned is I browse a lot on my phone.  I don't want to type a first message on my phone, because there's a good chance I might hit send too early because of fatty mcthumbs disease, or whatever.  So I'll view it once, think it over, etc., come back to it later when I have a minute on my computer with a legitimate keyboard.
The Harry Potter series. I've reread the series countless times.
Would have been even better if [this sound clip](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1MLry6Cn_D4) was playing non-stop in the background. 
That's not very nice : (
70:30, final offer.  Edit: Sorry if I got woosh'd. Being on reddit for the amount of time I am, I really assumed you were just trying to start a reaction gif circlejerk thread.
in regards to your egg on the Tannens having a pose of three, i didn't check to see if they are all played by the same actors, but i know for sure in II that one of the pose is a young Billy Zane 
nice. I'm guessing they most likely have raised lettering and a subtle 7 inch bone border?
I don't see a reason for stacking LoH anymore (IAS nerf), I farm act 3 with 18k dps and 0 LoH just fine. But if you want to stick with LoH I suggest getting as much IAS as possible.  For act 3 I would really recommend the [crit/tornadoes build](http://us.battle.net/d3/en/calculator/monk#aiXYgk!XUY!acbYYa). The gear can be quite expensive though but it's really the most efficient way (basicly get as much crit chance&amp;crit damge as possible). Otherwise you'll need the "oldschool" 1k+ LoH with high IAS and 1k all res, focusing more on [defensive spells](http://us.battle.net/d3/en/calculator/monk#abXigh!XUZ!aZZZYa).  It's up to you, but I can't recommend the crit build enough, you will be amazed of how fast you can fuck shit up.
Crap, 4 minutes late... uh... 2732
All you have to do is google "minecraft snapshot" and it's the top one
All dat ableism. For real, this is disgraceful.
Wrong. I added four red circles. 90% close to the original submission.  &amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
s sd s
An elephant cannot do the things a mouse can, and vice versa. And a mite hitching a ride on either can't exactly steer. We're people, we have more say in our own lives than even elephants, but not mystically so. Compared to nations, we are the mites.
good show!  also i unfriend people like you... im sorry if i don't know you and you post some weird snarky comment, im just going to unfriend you.  nothing personal mate... well it can't be now can it?
start with S1E1 of the rebooted series (2005).  Give it a few episodes.  If you aren't hooked by episodes 9/10 (the 2-parter The Empty Child/The Doctor Dances) then it's not for you.
Why aren't the forms of "weak" rape you described just "rape", and the other "violent rape" (violent being the one descriptor setting it apart)? In general language, we have blanket terms and also more specific terms. Is a cat a pet and a fish a "weak" pet?  Edit: The one thing all those situations having in common being "no valid consent".
They should make some kind of ball that tazers the person it hits. Maybe have to wear insulating gloves that allow you to hold or catch the ball... This game would be fucking hardcore as shit.
Rule 34 never ceases to amazing me
So go out and vote for people that do. Or support those to office with their campaigns. If you are too lazy and do not feel like it, or feel like corporations already have the upperhand and its a worthless battle. Then shut the fuck up about all this.
NSFW For the longest time I read it as Not Suitable For Work 
umm, do the same thing we do every night pinky. Try to take over the world.
I had something similar. Today while I was in line a new till opened up and the woman said "I can help the next person over here!"  Nobody moved despite the woman repeating herself several times, so I loudly said it to berate everyone else "Well if they're not going to, I sure will!" and got out of the store quicker than the ~5 people ahead of me in line.
I kinda doubt sites like Homestar Runner, MS Paint Adventures, Kongregate, or Newgrounds are going to go and remake all of their content in HTML5. That stuff is likely to just get lost if we get rid of Flash Player like this.
That is correct that you need multiple drives.  If you simply want a backup, you could keep one drive as your main OS drive and storage and a secondary drive as backup.  If you have crucial data, you could setup one of the drives on another machine in the house and share as a network drive and backup to it.
Maybe he could mark one [thusly?](http://imgur.com/2hjb0)
Poor Husband!  Mine has a daughter already from a previous relationship but when I talked with him about the possibility of tearing and perennial massage he was horrified. :). I think even more than I am!  ;). He had no idea that was a thing. 
Damn that is a slick wedding invitation. Kudos to the designer. 
Plenty of room at the island Valyria
&gt; As an Afghan, thank you.  I don't quite get that. AFAIK the situation of the civilians in Afghanistan has deteriorated since the beginning of the war and is continuing to do so. So what is there to thank for?
it's because people are spam downvoting you because you're disagreeing with someone who seemed knowledeable. it's reddit. bandwagon is all that matters. just for clarity i didnt downvote any of your comments regardless of whether i agreed or not.
She specifically said this, and I fought her on it. I get my information from her so i tend to agree with things she says... but this was a little too much. Sad that she was teaching biology =(
Artist - Track Not Track - Artist
we only have this one universe to go by. that is too small a sample to make guesses about how the universe *should* act. for all we know only 1 in a trillion universes that come into existence last long enough to allow life to develop. or perhaps of all the other universes are *not* friendly to life and this universe is the anomaly.
War we can win?  Like Afganistan and Iraq?
Yeah, while all the women go running off to the cinema to see this, trailing juice like a snail trail, we'll just sit there and not think of anything that could possibly be seen to be demeaning to women because that's Bad(r) and Wrong(tm) and you must be a real woman-hater to want to watch that kind of filth, what a horrible, filthy, sex-driven man you are, do 50 hail marys and carry my shopping in.  I mean, it's not like any woman EVER got insecure about anything before, right?  EDIT: As for your "sexualising women" comment, there's JUST as much gay porn out there as there is hetero and many women who watch porn watch hetero porn because they like the girls themselves. Two sides of every coin.
I know. I was expecting Satan in human form, but there you go!
Let's split up gang and get to the bottom of this.
Now my neck hurts.
best way would be tf2lobbys.com mate :)
I also did a puenting in baños last summer (a quite pussy jump actually) because it was my first and I had been canyoning so it was an intense morning anyway XD one of the things I most liked about Baños were the clouds and how they went up and down the green mountains... If you ever go back again to the ecuatorian Andes I suggest you visit the Chimborazo... I fell in love!
How does one "enjoy being unconscious"?
I kid you not... Me and my girlfriend were having a discussion the night before about walking on cracks and how I do it all the time without noticing. So the next day we were walking into school and she says "see!!" right as I stepped on one. She said I did it on purpose and then she started yelling at me about how I don't show her enough respect. Oh and of course I had to say sorry for walking normally. **tl;dr** stepped on crack, girlfriend got pissed, I had to say sorry about it all.
These results are a little outdated now.
I feel so sorry for that little dog.   shame on you for letting him/her get this big! 
I don't know, they're music is pretty superficial... Don't get me wrong, the aesthetic is cool and all, but if you ask me, there's not much more to it than that.
This "Player Name X" you are referring to....do you think he could center Kessel and Lupul?
.i ue lo cabdei cu jbedetnunsla .i ko pukfri lo jbedetnunsla be do  .i mi djica lo nu citka lo cakla titnanba   .i ku'i mi djica lo nu ba'e *do* citka lo cakla titnanba .i ui lo cabdei cu jbedetnunsla  (just for clarification, it was your cake-day when I posted this comment)
Great article. I learned about this sad state of affairs after I saw the documentary T-Shirt Travels (I can't find a link to watch online, but its well worth it if you get the chance). While the article illustrates just how much clothing waste we produce, the documentary goes much deeper into what happens when all our castoffs get to Africa. Some of it is good, some of it isn't, like how this basically destroyed the formerly thriving African textiles industry. Anyway, I try to buy a lot less clothes now. As a young woman, it can be hard, but I'm getting there. I'm hoping it will be easier when I'm not poor and I can afford to buy higher-quality clothes that last longer. 
"We are here to kick ass and chew bubblegum, and we're all out of ass"?
I thought with a Perfection, no deaths were allowed
Dude, she is messaging you when she is at a party. So, I wouldn't expect her to say much, but man, she is at a party, surrounded by other people, and she is talking to you. Seems like a good sign.
Speaking of /r/ainbow being better, what the hell is up with the /r/lgbt x-post? http://www.reddit.com/r/lgbt/comments/vt4yc/just_reconnected_with_a_former_hs_classmate_whos/  "Trans people are the reason your thread is being shit on!"  *rolleyes*
This one is equally as uncomfortable...talking about spanking and whatnot:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=oZ9TLftki5U&amp;feature=youtube_gdata_player
But if she doesn't exist, we can also say she uses all of those things.
If, as you pointed out, that 2 million in damages was already calculated into a 19% crime drop it's more than extremely limited - it's net beneficial.  "the city decided to engage in a spin campaign instead of apologizing, and shortly after released an unconfirmable outlandish story from suspect sources in an effort to demonize a movement bringing the administration bad press." is what that article said. It's obviously implying that the email is suspect. And if it happened, it would be about a million times less worse than putting a peaceful protestor in a coma, or making a family homeless, or lying about a peaceful protest to marginalize the real problems that it strives to address.
I've thought about playing it a few times but I've checked out the gameplay and I hate those kind of block puzzles in games. Considering that's really all the actual *playing* part of the game is, I can't justify it.
Protip: [Privilege](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Privilege_(social_inequality\)) is society-specific.
All within minutes, and still a better love story than Twilight.
Those volcanoes... There's nothing like slamming a 50 caliber round made of the sun into someone's chest.
That wasn't your claim.
Think of the lives we'd save!  Won't somebody think of the CHILDREN!?
Looks amazing  except for that nutella shit
Those are all awesome! for the coat though i like the NCR one the best. 
how is that relevant to this?
i wouldn't mind getting wet right now...
I always thought they were used for carrying long items too tall to fit in the backpack's main compartment.  I use mine for carrying a tripod if I'm going on a dayhike and want to take pictures.  I've seen other people use them for skateboards as they're also longer than the pack but light enough to carry.
I thought 0-99 was being a teenager, and 100-1000 was your adult life. Needless to say, I was quite devastated when I learned most don't live to even 99. I've developed quite the phobia of death, and an anxiety problem when I think of my existence..just stopping. I'll just cease to exist.   Oh boy, here come the feelings of dread and helplessness!
I meant in this specific case, with these specific restrictions, it can't possibly be a real problem.   If they used it for any purpose other than in regard to your interaction with the GW2 client and servers, then you would have legal grounds for a class action lawsuit against NCsoft.  For example, if they decided to sell this information to interested parties. They simply can't do that.
I have to ask, why wouldn't you plan on it now.  One person puts up a post with a few valid, but vague, concerns, both an admin and a site regular respond appropriately (for an Internet forum), and you decide that based off of that you're going to avoid a place like the plague.  Judging from your posts, Id say you're the type of player that wouldn't be welcome there anyways.
Uh check my history. I am a homeless alcoholic who has done shitloads of drugs. My actual feces are completely pale due to liver failure. I am an asshole but not from  doing drugs.
They're killing machines bred for one purpose, search and destroy.
&gt;if you are certain that the world will not end one day (which I would find very scary), one may expect that Evolution, science, philosophy, art etc. continue infinitely - isn't that great?  Actually, it's pretty much a certainty that the world will end one day. The Sun will expand in about 5 billion years and will vaporize Earth in the process. It's also not impossible that any number of human-caused events could kill us all or an asteroid could destroy all life.  &gt;Hitler's world view - including the racism - was based on religious teachings (e. g. that the Jews killed Jesus); he even considered Evolution theory as wrong (because it was backed by some Jewish scientists).  Hitler probably was a theist, but he was almost certainly not a Christian. His private correspondence and opinions were very anti-Christian, which makes sense because Christianity is based on Judaism. Further, Stalin, undoubtedly an atheist, tried to suppress information about evolution because he thought it was against the ideals of socialism.  &gt;Imagine, if we only had this life and no afterlife, would you not want to leave your children (or mankind in general) the best world possible? And would you not want other people to do the same? Would you not want to find out how the world works and tell others about your findings? Would you not treat people friendly so that they treat you friendly, too? Would you not try to live as healthy/happy as possible?  I've thought about the world and what it would be like if atheism were true. To shorten my answers to your questions, who cares? You'll be nothing after you're dead so what does it matter? I can see why you might be moral now, because there will be consequences that you'll have to face, but after your dead you can't feel shame or pride, joy or sorrow. Life is meaningless and even if we can give it our own meaning, that will all evaporate once we're dead. Humanity's existence is equally meaningless and could be considered one part of a strange array of coincidences that allowed life to form on Earth.
They do monthly "Jams" - http://www.reddit.com/r/piano/comments/ui8fc/piano_jam_6_june/ ... a good / fun excuse to challenge yourself and get some friendly competition between fellow redditors.  --Robert
I've discussed with my friends how street lights should be optional after a certain time of night.  It's just stupid to sit at a light for five minutes with nobody coming either way for miles.  I guess, in some municipalities, they do this to an extent.  The main roads flash yellow starting around midnight or so, and the side roads flash red.
It's one of the worst and most factually-incorrect.
Ivy Bridge didn't come with a very big performance increase, unfortunately. 
[Fuuuutuuuuureee!](http://i.imgur.com/PvZXD.jpg)
Dare I ask... how much did that gorgeous creation cost?
&gt; loud jackasses  I know exactly two jackasses, only one of whom is loud offline and both of whom have technical foundation in spades. So uh ... huh?
Just because you took a picture of a statue at an angle so it looks like a blowjob doesn't make it /r/wtf worthy.
&gt;Activists said  So basically, all we really know is a bunch of people died.  But you'll all blame Assad, because your trustworthy governments and media tell you it's his fault.  I'm not saying he's innocent.  I'm saying he's just as guilty as the opposition. 
This is sad. 
LITERALLY CTRL + F: "My 5 foot long neckbeard clearly indicates that I am superior and wise in the ways of science, logic, reason, TRUTH, and especially, what constitutes a gem and what doesn't. Allow me to outline the criteria for a true "little gem." At least 3 out of 5 of the following conditions must be met. (Source, my PhD in Atheism). A depiction of a cat or a mammal no more than 2 feet long by 1 foot in diameter, and must have a helpless facial expression Something that causes the viewer to "find" the irony or humour (note my superior spelling) in the image. Do not be too obvious! Something in close proximity to recent successful posts. Must be like others! Clearly shows the fallacy of theists (I just gagged a little) and/or women. Bonus points for both at once! Boobs, of course Now that you see the TRUE criteria, you, son, have clearly not found a little gem at all. But maybe only 90s kids will understand. You 2000s kids just don't get anything at all! Now get off my lawn before I wrap my neckbeard around your throat!"  SCIENCE IN HUMANITY = RESTORED!
I was in college.  I didn't have class until 1:15 on Tuesdays, so I'd taken a Tylenol PM late the night before and slept until about noon.  Woke up to a note from my roommate telling me to turn the news on immediately.  I sat there in shock by myself for about an hour, then threw on a sweatshirt and ran to class.  Surreal.
Those eyes. She's doing things to me with her eyes. 
Shaving private Ryan was also pretty good.   Gay but solid.
I was annoyed that no one caught that, then I remembered I'm a 27 year old male and got pissed that I did.
LOL I guess my 3 years of certifications mean nothing, OH HOW I BOW DOWN TO THE NEWFAG GOD THAT IS MR36, TEACH ME HOW TO BE AS NEWFAG AS YOU
*Depends*
Yes, but before the war on terrorism there was this little thing called the Cold War
That's more than me (I was 15 at the time)
From my point of view, if you're concerned about how I'm feeling, ask me. Don't demand that I give a semblance of being cheerful. (Unless you're in customer service or something, then I can see trying to be cheerful to help a customer but even then!) 
The church was struggling with their faith?
cuntbombed!
It used to be like that. DON'T START SMOKING POPPERS!! The headrush is nice, but now a straight bowl just obliterates me. Poppers don't even make me feel high anymore, just... I dunno, headrushed. 
One of the harder parts is dealing with people like you who blame me for their own shortcomings.
you suck at humor. Please die in a fire.
Crap. Another race featuring commercial breaks interrupted only by racing. 
If you don't want any perks, then probably Iron Armor, or Banded Iron Armor would be the way to go.  I do like the jewelry idea, but as you know silver and gold are hard to come across in those quantities. There is an Adept Alteration Spell called "Transmute Mineral Ore" that will change Iron ore into Silver, and Silver into gold. Not only is it a way to get good money, but that should get you enough Silver and Gold. The spell can be found in a Nord Ruin northeast of Riften in some mountains. The tomb's name is "Ansilvund" and the spell is in the final room after the "Boss" battle. Good luck on your mission!
But was it during D-Day?
If the walls are thin you are pretty much screwed. Unless they are doing something terribly bad no one is really going to take any action.
it's been wierd seeing kenseth and bifle doing so well, and carl not have the speed this year. think they might do a crew chief swap next year if speeds don't improve?
2 years for 109k words. I let it sit for a year and now I'm editing it and coming up on 4 years since I thought of the idea.
It looks so real!
Have them check your chain too. On a descent I had a stick kick up into the drive-train and bend the hanger in half. It also kinked the chain, wrecked the lower jockey wheel and almost destroyed some spokes. What a fun walk *that* was..
Always been in high. My teams are still mostly awful. 
10/10
Well, I haven't played in several months but last I saw Primevals would go for about 8p, and Deldrimor for up to 20p (although, it might be as low as 10p now).  All the others won't be worth nearly as much... maybe 2-4p each?
I'm now into month three of my search. I've attempted to make three bids so far. Two were sold on the first listing day before my bid even made it in. The third turned out to have some zoning issues. Already feeling discouraged.  As a single, thirty-something professional, I've predominantly been looking at condos close to downtown. In the past, the rule of thumb I've heard is that if the place shares a wall, you don't want to pay more than 250k, but I don't think I've looked at a single place under 300k.  
Good idea!   So does that mean that the router is being assigned an IP from the modem?   I had a quick fiddle earlier but unfortunately when I tried to set both the router and modem the same a static ip, the router still had the dhcp set to a different ip range, and I couldn't connect to either devices. 
It does causes seizures for those epileptics that are photo-sensitive; on others it may be a combination of triggers that cause it, like  reading reddit until 4am and then BAM flashing lights!  There have been reports of cartoons, movies and the like. I, for one, never look at any flashing gifs, which are a good example of the kind of visual that might potentially trigger an attack.
[Fortunate Son](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ec0XKhAHR5I) - Forrest Gump
Samsung galaxy x 2 skyrocket for att 
The Extended Cut version of this song was a huge addition to the game and for some reason, the composer(s) of ME3 always managed to match the on-screen action with scores that rival some of the best scores ever heard.   I have more respect for the composers of the trilogy than any other development team. They did a damn good job of giving impact and meaning to everything.
ss   dd   sd
He just writes it over and over again in the margins of his notebook.
I was annoyed with it because it didn't carry the strength that "fuck" does.  They used it constantly and it eventually lost all meaning.  If I recall, it was even used several times during the courtroom scene which leads me to believe that it just isn't all its fraked up to be.
No talk bad about Obama! He is love! He makes the rain to fall and the sun to shine!
At least we aren't mucking about on offense.
Start off by reading this book:  http://amzn.com/0736083715 
Didn't understand this picture at first, [our plugs don't just fall out by themselves](http://www.clasohlson.com/medias/sys_master/8872918188062.jpg)
Just google it. http://www.mtv.com/news/articles/1605765/key-differences-between-watchmen-comic-film.jhtml
RES tagged
George Washington was in a cult, and the cult was into aliens, man..
It's funny because WEATHER
Are there things you should look for while looping? when I'm doing a loop i will mostly hit the ground.
You are confusing me with some one else.
The text around the outside says Valar Morghulis.
The Duke looked a lot like Hugh Jackman because.... he... *was* [Hugh Jackman!](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=U6MlaIe1ljs)
Whenever my friend hugs me, she cracks my back. Now whenever she goes for a hug my back starts to hurt a little and expects to get cracked. 
I couldn't watch I Am Legend a second time because of the scene where he had to kill the dog.
Dude... That fucking blows. Take a Caribbean vacation. It'll be hot, but also HUMID. Much different.   Here's to getting outta the desert!  Semper Fi!
[Don't worry. Relax and think of nice things.]( http://www.imgur.com/waSQ7.jpg)
&gt;The ship wasn't that ugly to me.  http://fast1.onesite.com/capcom-unity.com/user/kramez/comiccon_2008/dsc04375.jpg?v=270000  Oh my god that thing is fugly.  Every vehicle that batman (the inverse archetype to Owlman) owns is super cool.  Every vehicle that Owlman owns is super-lame.  Likewise, Batman is strong, charismatic, and motivated.  Owlman is weak, friend-zoned by the ladies, and sits by to let things happen.  If you do some reading, you'll see that Owlman was intended to be the villain equal of batman.  Instead, he was turned into Batman's inverse in character.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Owlman_(comics)
Only for the one scene with "her" butt in it, and during an interview she at least implied that a bit of nudity isn't out of the question forever.  “I showed side boob and I figured I can’t just give everything all away at once,” Mila said on 102.7 KIIS FM.  “I gotta let it all out in little pieces here and there.”
[The more you know](http://againstlineofdance.files.wordpress.com/2012/05/themoreyouknow.jpg)
It's not that bad. Slow as it is, it can be incredibly hard to harm, and the 75mm is excellent agasint every other Tier 4, minus itself and the Hetzer. 
Well, the main reason is because people are just looking for an excuse to talk to people. It's usually much easier to initiate a conversation with strangers on the internet by asking them a question than by just posting a random observation or whatever. Some people want to be helpful and other people just want to show off how smart they are, so you're much more likely to get a lot of replies to a question.
I once joked that my friend fingered his girlfriend's butthole, to my group of friends, with a very serious look on my face. Well, I didn't expect anything to come of it because A: who would? And B: who would believe that?  Two months later, it was "the girlfriend fingered HIM with THREE FINGERS!" and people legitimately thought that it was true. One of my proudest moments, right there.
You're in denial about a lot of things.  * How much physical time have you spent with her? * Does she act like she wants you? Really, think clearly about this one. * Should you be obsessive about a girl to this degree?  
they arent really lucky. its call of duty
Unfortunately no, but he was using the drum machine on the pedal and turning the BPM way up, so it sounded like double bass
Who gives a fuck?
the reason someone (not me) downvoted you is because you get an essence from a yellow.  No one brought up the tear (except you) which is kinda irrelevant. The argument is breaking down a high lvl rare to sell the essence via AH or to vendor the rare directly for that sweet, sweet gold.
 Would you take potentially dangerous drugs without seeing a doctor? Of course not.  The only people who would are people who can afford the drugs, but not the doctor, and who are you to say that anyone too poor to see a doctor shouldn't be allowed medicine?
Haha sorry I meant , I saw the alpgaredditor user name and thought surely someone will mention the cini toast crunch story and there it was. 
:[ i was dumped by my ex-gf the day before valentines day.  I was miserable then but even more miserable the day after.
No, see, that's _not_ the conservative argument. Flip on the TV and you will hear a slew of arguments spanning just about everything. Almost like they are throwing shit at a wall to see what sticks.  If it was the only conservative argument it would be one thing. But it's being attacked as a bad law, not an overreaching one.
I don't hide either. I come to reddit for intelligent conversation. Why would I hang out on circle jerking subreddits like SRS if I want to just be in an environment full of people who are willing to be serious? Why surround myself with stupidity?
&gt; Well, I inferred. I guess maybe I'm wrong. Your username suggests you're probably an economic conservative, if nothing else. But that's definitely a pretty big assumption on my part, and thanks for calling me out on that.  it sure was.  being skeptical of Krugman doesn't make a "conservative" any more than distrusting Exxon's PR team makes you a "liberal".  &gt; Well, no. The data you posted have been analyzed by a guy who draws conclusions that contradict the claim that this thread is based on.  those conclusiosn being...charts of  official government data?  &gt; But, whatev. I stand by my Krugman rulz assertion, but beyond that no hard feelings in any case.  well, that's very loyal of you. did you ever see the video where Krugman says that the government staging a fake UFO invasion would be good for the economy?  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=RSChouIGfhQ  he also wrote a few articles advocating the housing bubble - and saying World War II saved the economy.  http://archive.mises.org/10153/krugman-did-cause-the-housing-bubble/  http://www.swifteconomics.com/2010/09/09/was-world-war-ii-good-for-the-economy-paul-krugman-thinks-so-i-dont/  he sells himself as a "liberal" - but it's far from it.  the guy is a PR agent for the criminals in multinational finance.  one time he did an "AMA" on reddit.  i had a few questions for him (albeit, after he finished posting) - he never did get back to me:  www.reddit.com/r/IAmA/comments/t1ygb/iama_nobel_prizewinning_economist_and_new_york/c4iz1ah  although i was admittedly pretty confrontational (i don't really like snake oil salesmen).
me and my dad argued for a good hour about the difference between a canoe and a kayak and which name actually corrisponds to the actual bo-  That got way to hard to word near the end. Im out.
Learn to search please.  Also downvoted for laziness.  http://www.reddit.com/r/leagueoflegends/comments/vn9eq/dominion_ranked_where/  http://www.reddit.com/r/leagueoflegends/comments/v173z/ranked_dominion_improving_meta/  http://www.reddit.com/r/leagueoflegends/comments/tvlge/has_riot_said_anything_about_ranked_dominion/ http://clgaming.net/redtracker/38830-rank-domination  http://clgaming.net/redtracker/38596-riotnome-can-we-get-update-on-dominion-issues
I don't like tomatoes, except for maybe ketchup. 
Makes sense.  Can't veto NDAA, but have to take a stand for Wall St and make sure the bailouts keep flowing under the auspices of their "reform" while making sure Glass-Steagall never comes Back.
International players can see it in game. It's at the top left of the menu screen - the one with the counter that shows the number of players currently playing HoN.  My estimate is that the average number of players starts at around 25k during the early morning (+8:00 GMT), and can reach around 40-60k during the evening.
942 fortix. Thanks.
How about some cinnamon toast crunch?
you mean roc. 
Ugh, Cogan's Trade is such a better title. Goddamn studios. 
He looks like he got caught doing blackface. 
I want to know if you are serious. I'm not "proctecting" shit I am just tired of all the fat jokes. The whiteknighting is for lulz and you are reading far more into this than is actually there. I am not trying to defend Gaben. But every fucking time anything valve related shows up top 3 is a fat joke and its fucking childish. I know I shouldn't expect class or intelligence from /gaming but at least people are seeing this and some agree and some don't and I am fine with that.
Similar thing here because I was constantly in trouble throughout high school. Teachers/principle would do the 'see me'/'we need to talk about something.'  Now when my boss asks for a quick one on one meeting, I get scared shitless.  The girlfriend is aware so this doesn't happen too often with her.
Well, given the names Marcus Aurelius and Julius Caesar, I'd say Roman times.
22 yo male, moving to SW Lakewood at the end of July, may end up in a similar situation as you so Ill keep an eye on this thread. 
Is anyone else worried about 2006scape?
Beg pardon, it was meant as a fucking joke.  I can see you guys have *serious business* going on here.
He's a staff member stupid. 
Every time I read or heard the word "Elements" in school outside of a science class I just tuned out until the lecture was over.
Dude, you just don't GET IT!  The Xenuvian - or 'Gray Man', for you SHEEPLE - recognized the involvement of the cow in dumbing down our youth, man! They KNEW that the pigs in the Establishment were POISONING OUR CHILDREN with their hormone-laden meats through that mind-controlling institution known as school! They wanted to save us from having said meat being shoveled down our throats at lunchtime by the school bullies just because I couldn't do his homework in time!  WAKE UP, MAN!
google cache of the pdf (for folks like me with wonky computers that object to them)  http://webcache.googleusercontent.com/search?q=cache:http://oneinfour.org.uk%2Fpdf%2F1in4%2520Learn%2520Cope.pdf
A few days ago i forced a team to drop 3-4~ thornmails for my yi.
dont forget that they also invented the inventor of yolo
Charged particles in a state of matter similar to that of a gas:  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Plasma_(physics)
&gt; every man with a penis  What about the men without penises?
Ladder 49...   A bunch of my Marine buddies and I were watching it in the briefing room (totally blacked out), and someone came in right at the end of the movie as the credits were rolling and flipped on the lights.   Every man in there was chopping so many damn onions. Camaraderie, man. 
Huh... I kind of want a Volt now. It's automatic, right? I kind of miss my shitty 510 because I could just keep it in my mouth and use it hands free.
I don't think you understand the laws of "calling it", I mean, how many times were you playing as a kid and up 3 goals when someone on the other side shouts "next goal wins!"?  It makes no difference what anyone **wants**, merely that somebody called it.  So winner gets Nesta.
Shivers all over, great job!
No. No they didn't.
Potential military threats never entered the equation.  If russia was more of a military threat why didn't Barbarossa happen before Sea Lion?
Depression is an illness and doesn't require a reason.  If you can't make an appointment yourself, tell your mom you need an appointment for something else.  When you get there, tell your doctor what you're thinking and feeling.
I took it for migraine nausia and it was ~$5 for ten of them.  This was some time after 2006 though which is when its patent expired.
Whut?  I'd like to see the before pics.  There's no way you aren't sexy.
A 20% service fee is extremely steep for a $5 gig. And I feel like you could make at least 5x that per job on your own on a boardwalk somewhere don't you?
What if he is smoking in Britain? Would that make him faggot smokin' gay faggot?  And I think that was the most Un-PC I've been on the internet for the week.
Any junior fans out there!!!
Motor oil isn't edible.
If you're still down for another person joining, I'm good. Steam name is Syranic, skype is cincoprivacyhelmet
You, me and the rest of us too. Maybe we should have an /r/drug get together...
[My reaction](http://picardfacepalm.com/picard-facepalm-hotlink.jpg)
NA - Spid3rPig I'm down to playing a few games and maybe teaching others some general knowledge.
I think you can safely go ahead and discredit those alternate realities and spiritual realms.
I see a bloody shoe - contact the medical first responders.... Nope grab pictures - OC karma baby....
AND MAURO FUCKING ROSALES
I will be saving this for when people ask me questions that can simply be googled. This drives me mad! Annoyed Picard is fucking fantastic.
Just speculating here, but it may have been a symptom of the Cold War as well. When the US was legitimately worried about the USSR and its 20,000 nukes, Pakistan and India having a few dozen wasn't deemed a huge concern. With the shift in focus away from massive nuclear annihilation by nation-states and toward asymmetrical attacks by unaffiliated organizations (terrorists), small and unstable nations with nuclear weapons seems a much bigger threat. 
That apartment sounds awesome. We've been looking for a place with a dishwasher in the WE - which building are you in?
yea, normally I'd love to go (never been paintballing and would love to try), but weather is too shitty right now. yall have fun though, and please post again if yall go in the future!
I pretty much did exactly what you did (trashed my ELO when I wasn't ready), since I leveled up initially mostly in dominion. I carried myself from 900 to ~1200, but have not been able to play much recently due to being home for the summer with a shitty connection. After the summer (like mid August), I can duo with you. My best roles in order:  Support: Leona, Soraka, Sona, So so janna, shitty pullcrank AD Carry: Kog or Vayne. Mid: Ziggz or recently lux. I'm so so at top, and suck at jungle. 
BTN probably would have some for for the right request bounty
I would love to sound like Sean Connery. Insults sound so much better with his voice!
I hate it when I get prot 3 on armor, I have a backup dispenser with a collection of failed pieces.
Came here to say this, I've just been listening to a skrillex, deadmau5, or pendulum (still remember when hold your colour came out, my how the music has changed) channel and most of the content that comes up is actually pretty good. It was touch and go there for a while.
I'm will be finishing my certificate program next April, I get alot of good feedback from my peers/teachers/friends. I know I have alot to learn, and it will take me a while to get to where I want to be. I never expected photography to make me rich and famous. I only expect it to make me be able to do something I love for a long time. 
I second this motion.
And most ancoms on this server support the hierarchy of democracy where they believe a majority of people can tell a minority of people what to do.   Ancoms on the server also support private property too, last time i was in panneton the chests were locked and only lsif members where allowed access them.
The next person to claim that a pearl is fucking property gets a Harm 3 molotov in the noggin. 
I'm gonna have so many friends now.
I didn't have Brimstone. I did have Chocolate Milk and picked up Sad Onion on that floor and my shots were were going faster, not sure if that has anything to do with it.
Tree fiddy
Thanks, exactly what I was looking for. I'm confused on what I should do with the background though, I don't want it to be white, but I do agree that the green is odd.
The [Youngster Joey challenge!](http://blackopalofdoom.deviantart.com/art/The-Youngster-Joey-Challenge-269676879)
This comment is sad on so many levels.  &gt;Abe Opatz · Shift Supervisor at Starbucks &gt; &gt;How pathetic. "Physically, I could not put down a video game." Get the hell out of here! Open your hands. The game isn't playing itself for goodness sake. Don't make excuses because you're weak. Own it and change.
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=u-54OpEwE0w
[I want that but with this song](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=JU9Uwhjlog8)
the final episode makes Mass Effect look like a water pistol fight. No offense, I love both Mass Effect and TTGL. They're totally different and no comparison is merited. But the scale of TTGL is one to be reckoned with. I think Gurren Lagann *alone* could eat through the smaller Reaper if the pilot aimed at the sweet spot.
You should have gone by seeds. Both of these memes are number 1 seeds to me.
Hmm... This amulet is decent for a monk, its both got ok defensive and offensive stats. There is not anything great about it though. I'd wager 150-1000k.
My girlfiend fell off the side of a mountain and lives.. Unimpressed :(   but for real, hope for similar luck inthe future lol
Join the San Diego Reddit Facbook group. Every time there is an even at a park, there WILL be slacklining
Well. Basically both nations had boats patrolling the coast of Lebanon a couple of years back. And as Sweden and Norway are neighbours with pretty strong bonds (we're like siblings), we always pull pranks on eachother when we can. Even the Army when in conflict zones.  So this is just Sweden and Norway joking with eachother.
Sleeping. I saw it on tv and my parents briefly told me what was going on after I woke up and was getting ready for school. I had noooo idea what was really happening. I didn't give a fuck because I lived all the way in California, and New York is aaaallll the way over there, so why should I worry? (I was ten.)
That's good! But, would the option of only having 3 fans instead of up to 10 with the Corsair case become a problem if I live in a place where hitting 90-100°F (with no A/C) is common?    I'm not really planning on doing some serious overclocking on this machine.     Thanks for all the input so far, expandas!
Thanks mate. But we're gonna record again this song !
The [ending](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=kdgK5d7Y5LQ) of Best of the Best when Dae Han hobbles over and gives his metal to Tommy...
Freshman year of college, I had a roommate kicked out of school after just one month. Another roommate, Adam, had a ladyfriend staying overnight. Adam slept in the upper bed of a bunk bed so this woman was sleeping with him. During the night, our roommate stood on the adjacent dresser, sexually assaulted the woman as she slept and masturbated. The woman had been sleeping and thought Adam was doing it so she let it go for a bit.  When I woke up in the morning, my other roommates sat me down for a meeting and told me what happened. The cops were already called. Later in the day we found a note from our roommate saying he had been caught masturbating but wanted us to still be friends. When the cops talked to him, he confessed to the assault too.   In the only act of any quickness I've seen from the university, he was moved out by that evening. I gave a statement and a cop gave me his number. Never saw that roommate again and heard nothing of the charges. I hope it ruined him, but he probably just moved back to Utah and nobody ever spoke of it.
By this logic the same can be said for peyote, dmt, opium and countless others. The plant is also for more than just getting high. It's got about a million other uses from textiles, food, paper etc. I would say the reason it is as prevalent as it is today is because of hemp production long ago and in the last 30 - 40 years people have begun to optimize the plant for optimal bud growth.
Yeah, pretty much any conversion is possible in theory. I should have specified "passive" conversion with no significant quality loss.
By far the best RS movie I've seen. However, I don't like the unoriginal story, but it's nice to see the time you've taken to make this. Sick intro too.
Can I still sign up if I don't know if I can make the finals at the Post Sports Bar &amp; Grill?
No, I was clearly talking about the political usage. I'm not sure why that would be misunderstood. Your original link was a later usage.  Now you are just backpedaling. 
I was taking a shit and my sister called. She wanted me to find something around the house. I told her I'd look when I finished pooping.  She promptly hung up.
&gt; I'm saying that part of the costs of HC in the USA are resultant of the overflow of people to their doctors' offices for things like flu shots, unnecessary stitches, colds, strep throat (which in the UK is simply known as "a bad cough" and is not a reason to see the doctor), etc.  I've just never heard anyone say this about the US. If anything, most people seem to say that in the US *not enough* people go to the doctor because they apparently can't afford it.  Are you from the US?  &gt; Prices here are not decided by supply and demand. That's a tiny component. If you believe that then I'll end the conversation because nothing I say will have any effect on your view of the situation.  But you *just said* that prices are high in the US because people overuse it. I'm really confused. You're saying things I've never heard anyone say before.
I go for the Loki look, I usually just get confused looks from children when I wear masculine clothes
jrh1196 speaks the truth, out logic'd
2395
:c
It was most likely a phlebotomist, not a nurse. Sorry for what probably sounds like semantics but as a nurse, we get blamed for stuff that doesn't really apply to us quite often. If it was a nurse, sorry, I'll see myself out. 
So for Caleb, when  people don't agree with his views he wants them to die.  There have been a few figures in history who felt the same way.
Can it get any more biased in your sources?
Oh god, I wish I hadn't clicked that. So amazingly acted, but now...epic sad time :(
really?  Since cats don't give birth to dogs, god = true?  This is a proof?  believers actually have drivers licences and other stuff.  Based upon this 'proof' of theirs; allowing them to have modern conveniences no longer seems safe for society.
Multiple stomachs, definitely worth researching for an alien species. 
As was said, they aren't taxed because they used to be both a major source of charity and a core element of life for most Americans.  Nowadays, I think they should be taxed, but if they are proven to meet other tax-exemption/reduction criteria (i.e. charity), then they should certainly receive the corresponding tax exemptions.
You are small time, son. (http://i.imgur.com/WnLKO.jpg)
Well I'm wondering why I've seen absolutely NO ONE build a second IE while I was lvling, in my 1000+ lvl 30 games, and in numerous streams or tournaments. Same thing with youmuu on an ad carry, apart from people trolling with the recommended item build on graves for example.
Don't feel bad.  I die a little each time I hear someone say that another person is homophobic.  There's a huge difference between fear (a phobia) and hatred or strong dislike.
Also if a hoax kind of elaborate for back then if you ask me.
[Ash Catsup?](http://gifsoup.com/webroot/animatedgifs4/1078799_o.gif)
savageravage190
why would anyone use hulu plus, then?
I just bought her, so not sure of her previous diet. I will be feeding her presoaked pellets though. I'll keep an eye on her.
Selection only, ALT for large engagements.  Otherwise it looks like a gigantic moving bar graph, and statistics courses never exactly screamed "spectator sport" to me.
My body is ready, Dovakin
I hope you've heard of the Spatial AKA orchestra. It's the legendary Jerry Dammers' new Ska/jazz/Sun-Ra tribute/orchestra. They're so amazing.
[Your suspicions are correct](http://www.straightdope.com/columns/read/1560/whats-the-meaning-of-jesus-teaching-about-the-camel-going-through-the-eye-of-a-needle).
I really liked the movie, but I felt Snyder's camerawork was pretty suffocating.
I'm curious as to what happened to the stock.  I found out the new price of the company yesterday and was so surprised.  Low EU earnings cost the share ~$5?  That just seems crazy to me.  Ford is still the strongest American car company out there for the foreseeable future.
[Nope](http://research.microsoft.com/en-us/um/people/cormac/papers/2009/SoLongAndNoThanks.pdf)
I find Subjogators to be the most annoying pack as a melee... especially when they have things such as electrified to amplify their melee dmg... they seem to hit me as hard as Mallet Lords if not even harder, their "Mortars" do nothing though.
Great knife have always wanted one.  The last one I tried to bid on at an estate auction went for $650 
you guys got PJ3.....
So how much does the treatment cost?   Lol pffft   Time to invest in rehab centers
you make good points. Have you messaged the mods? Also, I don't think any of this legitimizes OPs subreddit
Also, check out the flylady system. Or the cleanmama blog. I find both to be really helpful! 
I honestly laughed out loud. Thank you for sharing!
I don't understand how people still view Germany as our rival/nemesis, IMO the french are so more annoyingly condescending towards us as a nation and after the Euro game against them the way the French players talked you'd think they were Spain or Brazil.
Those are issues causes by poor design choices and OEM meddling, not by Google's refusal to put a leash on their users.  You could remove an iPhone's artificial limitations (as millions of 'jailbreakers' have) and it wouldn't suddenly inundate iOS with compatibility issues. You could do it to Grandma's own phone and she wouldn't even notice. 
dat ass...
"I go. You, stay." :(
I thought that everyone was actually bisexual and just chose what orientation they wanted to be. So I was "straight" because I only dated boys, but still got crushes on girls.   This lasted until I was 15 or 16.
Sweet, 2 ADC 17" monitors! I've got two ADC displays (a 23" HD and a 23" cinema) hooked up to my mac mini. The hardest part about that nowadays is finding the ADC to DVI adapter to run them on newer macs.  The single plug for USB/Power/Video idea was cool back in the day, but didn't catch on. Nice to see that thunderbolt is being implemented a little bit more successfully.  As far as the G5... don't even bother turning it on. Obsolete, power hungry and failure prone. There's a reason it was in the garbage.
I was assuming Shaq just became 5'3 in this alternate photoshop universe rather than assuming Shaq stayed the same height and the entire world grew around him, my bad.
I got into a ridiculous argument with my History teacher in HS over this movie because he thought it was necessary to tell everyone the movie was stupid because the only "true" thing that happened in that movie were the first 15 minutes, and the rest was all BS. I countered his argument by stating that, granted the rest of the movie was a dramatized story and wasn't historically accurate, but there were tons of stories *like* that throughout the European campaign. It was truly one of the best ways to summarize the early part of the invasion with out diluting it with historical figures casted by the Hollywood elite. (His argument was that the movie The Longest Day was better.) Up until that point World War II movies were always featuring galant scores and great acts of heroism. Saving Private Ryan had the honesty of a post-vietnam era war movie with the complex characters that felt like they were plucked right from history and thrown into a movie, and not the other way around. 
Nice!! Make sure you're dosed for Phil's set, if not Bobby's.  but really, you should try to make it up to their Furthur show in Chicago or Detroit a couple days before All Good if you can.   Although, I imagine they have something very cool cooked up for All Good so it should be good either way. Dose about an hourish before the set starts. That's what I usually do.
I don't think i buy that.  In one of the Elder Scrolls Adventures a dude accidentally gets enchanted into a sword instead of his old body, and the sword then has his memories and personality, and i don't think it mentions anything about pain.
It is greyed out for me. I think you can create more but it resets your preferences/keybindings etc or so I have been led to believe. He may well have done this....or that is what his computer is called!
If we use his character, we should try to have at least one Jack Black cultural reference. I nominate School of Rock or Tenacious D.
Holy crap that is creepy. 
I'm female, and 37 years old. Well, tomorrow, I'll be 37 tomorrow, at least.
both of them? NOOO!
???ishusteedus???
7th in the AL in runs, 10th in home runs, 8th in RBI, 8th in OPS. Apart from two big hitters, they're a distinctly average offense.
That's what I was afraid of.  Thanks. +1 for the red shirt reference.
my internet is too slow where i am atm, but as far as i can see, you spectate random people from your stream and commentate over that? Well if that is the case, perhaps you'd like to spectate my premade team play normal draft tomorrow and tell us what we could be doing better? PS: upvotes for good guy cleverest!
White Chicks.  Vanessa Carlton - A Thousand Miles.
I've often thought of courage wolf and insanity wolf as those two wolves. 
Bud before beer and you are in the clear ;)
It blew my mind when I learned that. Because "peaks" just seams to fit.
I see your parents had the basic wisdom not to name their son "Channing"
It's easy for me in the pool. But on the ground, I can't. In fact, I pulled a muscle in my arm doing so once. It kind of hurt.
yeah and when it's prnounced pidg-it bulbapedia has it down as a mistake 
Google map your address and zoom out to the county and imagine the county in divided in fourths.  This will tell you your location.  
TINC...There Is No Cat  I got here when I lived in an apartment where pets weren't allowed.  So if they ever said anything to me like "You need to pay a pet fee or get rid of your cat" I could reply "I don't want to do that for There Is No Cat."
LOL, the first question on the quiz is "What's Earth's true shape?" And "flat" shows up as an answer.
someone probably took a picture of a cow looking at the camera funny
Ozil   Khafira--- Torres- Pirlo   Buffon
Holy shit - did lightening hit that car?  I thought that wasn't scientifically possible as lighting would go the path of least resistance - not through rubber
I use an empty winded spray bottle or something similar and put about a nickel size dollop in the bottom. Fill slowly with water so it doesn't suds over. Cap it and shake before you spray. 
Are you really crying?
http://www.lereddit.com/
Nice offside goal there...
What about Cinnamon Toast Crunch?
I become incredibly thankful for what I have every time this is reposted. 
&gt; was what I **SAW**  when muslims write "(saw)" after their inspirational quotes and stuff, I always imagine someone getting their head sawed off.
DDE streams quite a bit and always gives analysis during/after a game. He averages 20 viewers, it's ridiculous. Being a "personality" is a huge factor for popularity, not game knowledge or skill. MKP gets 2.5k viewers while byun plays replays of him 2 raxing, with 20 minute pauses in between while they count their ad revenue. (Edit: not saying MKP isn't skilled, but let's be honest: that's not MKP we're watching.)  - Play constantly - Pick some major points in the game and briefly describe what happened.  Simple stuff.  If Kas could just speak English, he would by far be every Terran's favourite Terran streamer. He's my favourite anyway, that's for sure. Plays constantly, no abrasive background noise, never goes afk for like half an hour for no reason. Just him playing games. I love it.  Edit: great, this is exactly what I mean. QXC's stream right now is a webcam showing a blank chair and 2 random guys yelling REDDIT BROKE HURR DURR. 15 minutes later, QXC arrives back in his chair, eating. Why oh why do I have to watch this? I tuned in to see a decent Terran play games. The whole attitude is just... too casual. I don't like the feeling that someone gets thousands of viewers for nothing.
My school made us all watch the video and we had to write a report on what we can do in our everyday lives to stop Kony...
this and more retarded shit brought to you by the church of scientology
As I sit here on my reliable Dell Inspiron laptop, I feel insulted by your insinuations. The only thing that would clear the bad taste from my mouth is an ice cold, refreshing Pepsi. 
Whole milk is 3.75%. I've never seen a brand of milk that didn't say this, it just isn't in numbers two inches tall. Check out your homo milk, duude.
I would watch a silent stream in a heartbeat just to see the shots if they can't afford paying announcers for TV that isn't being broadcast.
He's such a pain in the tail.
Especially in HS.. You're only going to get rabbits, you'll find tokers easy in college :)
Trying to setup dates with underage dudes probably isn't a good look. 
Lilly Hammer.  
"make dresses" "sabotage dresses" then "display dresses"
In this price range, AMD IS YOUR FRIEND. Their Trinity line of APUs just came out for laptops and currently only HP supplies them. A base model with an A6 dual core in it will cost about 350, but will blow anything by Intel away in terms of integrated graphics.
The plugin which adds that /seen command doesn't seem to handle it too well when you try looking up a player who has never been on the server. Since it can't find the last time the player was on the server (seeing as it doesn't exist), it is instead calculating the amount of time since the [Unix epoch](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Unix_Epoch).
Portal 1&amp;2, Batman games, Mortal Kombat (Most recent version, I think its listed as 11),Borderlands, Call of Duty Modern warfare - the first new one not the ones following it.
He never was a breakthrough character in Doctor Who, his only memorable scene was him leaving Rose so he could live on the parallel Earth.  Then he marries Martha Jones, dafuq?!  Kidulthood and Adulthood are supposed to be good, but I don't have the time for those sorts of films, he makes ones that are so similar, he's about to put out his third movie this year isn't he? Storage 24?
My brain just exploded, seriously this is great! Thanks for sharing!
The other would be one wide angle shot.
When i was younger, my dad (who split up with my mum when i was 4) asked me and my bro and sis to stay with him and my new step mum for a week. We got to his place and on my temporary bed was a pile of new clothes and a passport. Still completely oblivious to the passport, i was so happy with my new clothes and so were my siblings who got the same. For the rest of the evening, i didnt understand why my dad was making turkey noises, but in the end he had to tell us the surprise, a week in turkey! :-D i still dont get why i missed the hint!
Most of the epic Assassins Creed Scenes. The scenes from Halo: Reach where each character dies(except Kat). 
Think it's hard selling a painting? Try selling a sculpture. Relativity aside...  Two years is not long enough to expect one's career to take flight, Especially in art. Especially if you did 't get an art degree (which is really about networking, at least as much as honing theory and practice). It's not that i don't sympathize. Doing what you love and living off it without losing your mind is THE hardest game to play. Bit two years? Sorry, but get over it. Don't give up. It will require a job on the side. I don't agree with turning original works into prints if you expect serious contemporary galleries to support you. But if your goal is to sell out of fine arts galleries, the. Do it. Painting on commission works too. Online works, as does entering shows long distance. As for framing...Minimal framing works better for paintings, imho, and though i know certain venues require them most paintings are best without. Save some money there...
I have dreams every night about junk food binges and some times ones of my hair and teeth falling out. It's really haunting. 
So from this we can just conclude that all beer snobs are morons. Got it, thanks for the info.
Yeah you kinda are
I repossess cars. Here in Texas it is a felony if someone refuses to hand the car back over to the bank or credit union when I show up and demand it. That's why it is so much easier to just grab it in the middle of the night. It saves the debtors a lot of trouble in more ways than one. Do you find that people get really crappy with you even though it is nothing personal?
¿Pero no se supone que el PRI en sus gobiernos maquillaba las estadísticas para aparentar mejoría? 
Check this out from $14/year:  http://securedragon.net/index.php?p=openvz
Less judgment and more confusion... I was thinking that this was your *parents'* idea, but on a second read it sounds more like your idea.  I was trying to figure out what the hell kind of parents pass commentary on their kid's shits... this makes more sense though.
There's always work to go around. If you have available time you can help out on someone else's engagement!
Who thinks you're a bitch for not smiling at guys? I'm a guy, and I wouldn't mind it at all. Sod them.
http://www.suzuki-forums.com/general-forenza-reno-forum/28869-dtc-p2135.html  Sounds like the TPS sensor in your throttle body is bad (not uncommon,  happened to me one two different vehicles now).  The downside is according to this post,  the TPS is built into the throttle body so you may need to replace the whole unit.  My suggestion would be check online to see how much it is to replace, and if it's pricey you may want to try swapping it out with a TB from a junk yard first. 
Good point ANAL_BUTTRAPIST.
well obviously if it works for you then fine but one of the reasons that its not recommended to shave with that is because the propellant and some of the chemicals in those actually dry the skin instead of moisturizing it.  Since moisturizing and warming are kind of the idea of the preshave as well as the shave im not sure barbasol is the ideal product.  Again if it works for you then its ok. i just wanted to put it out there incase you were unaware. if you were i apologize, im certainly not trying to tell anyone how they have to shave. 
They're discussing changing it, but a lot of people are against it - they claim it's part of what makes this country great. Kubrick lived here, in part because of the harsh copyright and libel laws. He used them to his advantage (He sued someone for quoting a single line of a conversation, and won). There's a tradition of harsh libel laws, which are sometimes almost comically harsh. Let me give you an example: &gt; &gt;A woman has written a book. She goes to publish and review copies are sent out. A reviewer reads it and he realizes, he knows the author and some of this sounds familiar. This man claims this character might be in part based upon him. *Might be*. *In part*. Her book has never been published.  Parody is 100% not covered in the UK. The libel law changing might, at the most, get parody included. Parody has been tested and lost time and time again. Right now it isn't included and a lot of people have a problem with that.  Shakespeare ripped off everyone. Greeks, Italians, the Welsh, the Irish, and more - but he borrowed mostly from antiquity. The argument doesn't hold up too well, because he was rewriting classical works, not contemporary fiction. Shakespeare didn't read Marlowe's Fautus, then take his characters and expand the fucking universe without telling him. Shakespeare was taking old poems, stories and myths and dramatizing them for a wide audience. I really am not comfortable at all with someone writing fanfiction about my work. I not only don't see any value in it - but I don't even understand the motivation. If you don't have a voice, then don't write. That's it. Do you know how many people I know who say "I don't read much, but I love to write my own stories" - Fanfic is what they write. I'm not kidding, they do. No matter your argument, Fanfic is the refuge of bad writers with no style or voice.   The "when your learning guitar, you don't play your own songs..." argument is also rubbish. Fanfic is not helpful. You know what you should write about? Stuff that happened to you. Roman' a clef. Develop your own characters, using your life as a starting point. Not someone else's work, someone else's life. That's not fucking relevant to you. They're not you. You're not them. It's very easy to ape someone else's voice. Find your own voice. Fanfic is short hand for "I can't be fucked to try on my own".
I could have sworn you were about to get into an argument
Actually seeing some videos of that game inspired me to play a scary game. I only have a laptop though and playing on it is just annoying. 
If you get drunk you spent enough to cover a cab here and there.
Man that looks good [7]
Lack of sponsorship will do that. Especially when you have willing sponsors(in RG's case, Motorola) run out of the sport by heavy-handed no competiors clauses. 
very nice. i'm so glad i found listentothis.
...You do realize you can be a feminist and support mens' rights, right? I find the term karma-whoring to be related to someone who is needy for karma and attention from complete strangers rather than what you are implying (that any woman who posts who posts pictures of themselves on Reddit to be "whores"). I'm sorry to anyone who thinks this is rude, but I keep getting this feeling whenever I see this subreddit flooded with these "self-esteem" posts. Why not just make a subreddit for that (if there isn't one already).   I'm noticing your comments on this post and I get the feeling that you're just shooting down everyone who disagrees and calling them a troll.
And all you have to do is, enter that rabbit hole, if you'd like. You don't really have a choice though
If Lilith shows up then I think it'll have something to do with the Fae. I read somewhere that this season we'll learn more about them and if anything could bring back the mythological progenitor of the vampires it's some pure Fae blood.
oh then chaos emperor drag all day
Oh really? I didn't know that, that's interesting. Im from the South and i knew we had a lot of Baptists but that's a lot! So the county color is determined by the denomination that's the majority?. Idk i still feel the minority denominations in those areas should be represented some how too. But anyway thanks!
When I was level 10, Shaco had massive crit damage from deceive.  When I was level 10, Ryze was built AP and was OP.  When I was level 10, Evelynn was OP with her AP build.   When I was level 10, TF's level 1 Teleport gave easy FB.  When I was level 10, people get angry when people jungle.
A frisbee. Going to the park would never be the same again
no yellow pages??? how can you order pizza or Chinese food? or a plumber?
That alone is enough for me to respect him over most other presidents. I love that speech. It makes me cry every time I watch/hear it. I can't though because it's just too sad.  Also, he's the last bit of serious military experience we had in the Oval Office. Couldn't be more important these days.
that makes no sense so I guess you realized you're wrong
I have to ask.  What do you think most Afghanis think about the fundamentalist religious people?  The one's pushing the radical agenda?
I've really got to start reading the replies before I just click on links, ugh!
You are describing [Markham, Ontario](http://www.spaceandculture.org/wp-content/uploads/2008/06/markham-suburbs.jpg).  Look at [this map](http://goo.gl/maps/721q) of the area I grew up in and you can see the progression. Senator Reesor's Drive was built in the late 60's.  We were one of the first families to move onto our street.  Houses had good size yards and there was plenty of separation between them.  Below Senator Reesor's Drive was built up in the 80's-90's.  Still a bit of space and yards but things are getting closer together.  To the right on the other side of the 9th line is the most recent developments that are built like in the picture above.  No separation, no yards, all house.  Everything outside the Senator Reesor's drive loop used to be wide open farmland through which I rode my bike in summer and cross-country skied in winter.  I don't go back anymore as it's too depressing.
Instant Hobbit hole.
["Why should I change my name? He's the one who sucks."](http://i.imgur.com/BzFTP.jpg)
Love lol basically
&gt;The Byzantine state was exceedingly wealthy for the majority of its existence, how else would Justinian be able to launch campaigns in Spain, Italy, North Africa simultaneously?  Well the vast majority of the history of the Byzantine state is post-Justinian.  If you'd like, I'd revise the statement to state that the Byzantine state was flat broke for the majority of the time post-Justinian.  &gt;Looking solely at the reign of Heraclius and calling the Eastern Romans poor, is like claiming France was poor by only examining it during the Napoleonic wars.  Again, pretty much post 630, the Byznatine state was broke.  There were brief moments where this was not the case, but compared to their prior wealth or to the Roman period, the Byzantine state was broke.  Rich compared to some other places on the continent, but a shell of its former self.  &gt;Justinian was certainly not a western emperor, he ruled form Constantinople at a time when there hadn't been a western emperor for over 100 years, he spoke Latin as opposed to Greek( which I guess you could make the claim makes him more western then Eastern)  Well, Justinian thought of himself as a Western emperor.  His stated goal was the reconquest.  I mean, it's really semantics.  Justinian speaks Latin and ruled in Italy.  He's the last Roman emperor that you can say that about.  Pretty much after Justinian, all the Byzantines spoke Greek and ruled in the Balkans and Asia Minor.  &gt;As I already mentioned the Roman army was not a mercenary army prior to Heraclius ( although it did contain large numbers of foreign troops).  Okay, coming back to this.  I don't think you're quite right here.  Not just Ostrogorsky (who admittedly has been proven to be off a bit by later scholarship), but a number of other sources put Justinian's army as mostly mercenary.  J.B. Bury's *History of the Later Roman Empire: From the Death of Theodosius I to the Death of Justinian I* concurs about the majority of mercenaries.  Procipius, by the way, lists Belisarius's force to re-take Rome as thus: &gt;It comprised no more than 15,000 men, of which 10,000 infantry, about half Roman and half Foederati, and 5,000 cavalry, consisting of ca. 1,500 of Belisarius' own bucellarii, 3,000 Roman and foederati cavalry, and 600 Huns and 400 Heruli horse archers.
Yep. None here. Cancelled our damn fireworks...
I covered the crate with several towels so it was nice and dark, and put in blankets and a dog bed. My scared beagle used it for a couple months, less and less, until she was comfortable out and about all the time.
He's usually on Broadway around Cricket's. I've seen him around there for about 9 years now. He used to be a huge dick when you wouldn't buy him a beer for doing the shit he does. Don't know if he's changed at all.
It's shocking to me how many people seem to have just discovered his immense talent. 
I've had a guy do this to me!  He took me home from a mutual friend's party, both of us roaringly drunk and making out/dry humping on the hood of my car while we waited for a taxi, and (as I later learnt) my GGG mate whom I had slept with in the past had played wingman when he realised I wanted this guy. And by 'played wingman' I really mean that he told him straight up I was down to fuck and like it up the ass.  We get back to his place, I go to the bathroom and come back to find him (presumably) naked in bed. So, naturally, i strip like lightning and get in on top of him to find his shorts are still on. Ok, I can sort that out myself, cool. Make out for a bit, start to move south and he stops me. Ok, he wants to go first, what a gentleman! He goes down on me briefly, we make out, I try to go down on him and he stops me....  AND STARTS TO FUCKING CUDDLE.  So at this point I think, ok, this is a bit weird, but he's probably just too drunk to perform. That's cool, shit happens, let's see where he wants to go from here...  "so, uh, everything ok?" "yeah, why?" "uh... Are we gonna fuck, or are there some minor technical difficulties?" "oh. Uh. No. Can we just cuddle?" "Um. That's a bit weird. I barely know you, I'm naked, and I'm kinda confused about why you brought me home." (yes, I find cuddling more intimate than sex, no, I don't have daddy issues. Deal with it, son) "well I really like you. Can I take you out for breakfast in the morning? I don't sleep with people I've just taken home from a party.." "oh. Um. No, sorry. A bit of warning would have been nice. I'm just gonna go, then."  I don't think I've ever dressed so fast in my life. 
Snapfire, not overwatch. troops that go to ground can still take snapfire shots.  I haven't yet seen anything that hints at snapfire (or overwatch for that matter) can't be improved. You said earlier that snapfire is a 'set' modifier that couldn't be further modified, I'm curious where you read that.
It's funny, I was considering giving blood before this..."***was***".
My current gf was 'raped' by an ex (her best friend says the story went from consensual to regret to rape). Over last summer, she slept with a guy at a convention who was much older than her.  Now, since me and her didn't get together until about October, I didn't care. But when me and her had sex the first time, she told me I was her 'first consensual experience'. I asked her about that guy at he con, she denied it ever happening and it was a fake story she told me because she wanted attention from me because she liked me.  Move onto today, 9 months after we started dating, I got an anonymous email with images of chat logs between my gf and this guy. Proof that they slept together over the summer. I called her out on it, she still denied it. Eventually she broke down and admitted to it, but I was like "You lied to me for 9 months making me think I was your first after your 'rape'. Why did you do that to me? Do you even know how much this hurt me?" "I'm sorry"  Bitch. Those words do not absolve you of your errors.   Moving on to the other contents of that email? Other logs. One of them showing that my current gf, not even 2 weeks after starting dating me, had feelings left for the guy. Also, the same day we had sex, she told him she fucked me out of pity (virgin) and that sex with me compared to him was terrible. And the nail in the coffin? Him inviting her over for pizza and stuff while his parents were away. She said "We wouldn't eat pizza would we lol" and then he suggested moving to MSN.  She had no saved logs.  I was also given her account email and password to look at this info first hand to prove it wasn't faked. All checked out. After me and my gf talked this all out and ended with her realizing that this is not at all acceptable? The logs were deleted by her. All of them.  Will I ever know if she actually cheated? Nope. Gave her benefit of doubt because she's been so damn sweet, but her best friend is looking into it in ways I couldn't hope to do.
Worst decision ever. xD
These guys are awesome. Doing things for the community even when on breaks.
Quite honestly, this is the last time I cried in a movie theater. I was eight. I thought that pokemon was over forever. 
anthony bourdain is a snobby twat.
In the new snapshot you get experience for many things such as mining ores and also cooking food and smelting ores.
Haha, thank you very much! :D
When the legs popped out I about shat myself. Then some more came out and I was like oh thank god... It's just a cat... Awwww..
When I was level 10, I used to run smite and the mastery for the extra gold, as I thought it would add up, and "ensure" more cs even if I lost lane.  When I was level 10, I thought twitch was the hardest champion ever so I decided to only play him and master him.  When I was level 10, I ran Mejais on Karthus and Teemo  When I was level 10, I thought Pantheon and Xin were the most OP champions.  When i was level 10, I started with Dorans and one pot.  When I was level 10, I only played Twisted Treeline.  When I was level 10, I thought skins were the dumbest things ever.  When I was level 10, I thought the atk speed build was the only viable way to build Kog Maw.
Actually, i'm using an SWF decompiler, i was poking around, and this was hidden inside some swf files. On a different and more hilarious note, all the .dat files in lol are actually renamed swf files.
Buy Easton carbon next time. I've had three sets myself (all mtb) and I've had no complaints. They last years if you proberly tighten the stem, levers, grips, (not too much!). I've crashed at speed up to 25 mph, the bike has bashed into rocks handlebars first and years later the scratches (obviously clearcoat only) no longer scare the crap out of me.   Just my $.02
Upvote because I did this when I was a kid! (except we were poor so I had to make mine out of toilet paper tubes, string, those paper things on clothes hangers, and paper).
When I was level 10, I built Wit's End on Leona because I'd sometimes find myself in a 1v1 situation at the end of a fight and looking at Wit's End I thought to myself, "Hey, offense and defense in the same item!"
I support the homosexual fairy pigs these were harvested from. 
He also supported Spanish nationalists, no amount of cats and melting watches makes him a good man.
~~Now, KISS!~~  Fuck! I hate reddit. Everytime I log in the page changes and new comments appear so I didn't notice there was already a commentary like mine...
DLP (Dark Lord Potter forums), but don't post stuff there unless you're 100% sure it's at least decently written, or that you at least have the balls to have your work exposed to people who might not like it. In the Work by Author subforum (where people post their stories for feedback) there are rules that prescribe helpful, non-dismissive posts, but I wouldn't count on feedback never coming across as offensive.  Oh, and there are a number of fic types that aren't really well received there, most notably slash, certain pairings, non-Harry centric fics. But it's likely that anything goes as long as it's well-written.  The forum is great, though. Has some of the best authors in the fandom.
Thus began the story of Lyra, the hook horror.
The post is still young.
Just like the games, Colin Mcrae and Dirt.
Thats awesome! Is it a custom box?
111
They keep fairly well and are fucking delicious.
lol that's cute of you. Just because something is fallacious does not make it incorrect. You're fallacious in your identification of fallacies. Babby's first logic?
Children cannot consent to anything - they may assent, but it is not the same thing. Parents/guardians are the ones who must give consent for their child. Arguing that an infant cannot have a medical procedure performed on it because it did not give consent is asinine. 
Thanks alot for this!! I already know about the whole thing about accepting the fact I'm gonna sound terrible for the first few years playing it.. but the rest of this has been very informative.  My violin lessons are actually starting a few days from now (July 3 :)!). Thank you!
Now you can live for yourself, not for somebody else :) The things out there O.O You have no idea and flirting with girls is so awesome ^^
;_;
He would have to tell you -- otherwise how could you carry out the punishment? He pretty much has to tell you what is expected of you, at least in the US.
Tobi we all understand your sexual frustration, but please never [cast with that bint](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9CcpC3ot9Fo) ever again, no matter what. Flirt with her outside of casting hours, if you must, but for what it's worth I believe you can do better.
The falklands? Two paras charged a machine gun position 100 metres away and ended up being shipped home to receive VCs... posthumous.  Korean war hasn't ended. But whilst the fighting was hard, it wasn't 'close quarter' 20 metre sort of stuff. I'm not sure about a British battalion being lost though.  Our entire war dead from Korea was 1080 IIRC. Not including POW or wounded though which is about 3600 together. I'd be interested in reading about it though, if it happened.
A pig fell in the mud.
How old is the dictionary you're using, in that rape is an act only committed by a man?
Fuck you RYU!  You damaged my house and now I'm going to have to send Ken to collect on your ass.
  I think you could sell your services to /r/bleachshirts . Cutting patterns out of freezer paper.
If you keep track of the sets of connected positive values, you can just store a pointer to a single element of each and run the algorithm around the outside faces of each set.
I figure the RMAH is blizzards way of preventing people from being ripped off.  It's gonna happen anyway. This way the seller gets their money, the buyer gets their item/gold and blizz gets a cut.
I think you're experiencing a lot of the puppy dog love coming to an end.  I think we need more details on your relationship, (i.e. length, age, sexual relations, et cetera) to know whether what you're experiencing is actual lack of love.  True love, well, it's the hardest thing you'll ever go through.  Marriage is hard... Really fucking hard.  It's not easy to consider being with ONE person you're entire life; so to say you have "fallen out of" love makes me think that you could just be losing certain attractions.  Maybe you just need to rekindle it in some shape or form.
Yes sir!  http://i.imgur.com/4D8oA.jpg
I cannot argue this. Being, realistic, at least they chose to look like us instead of robes and crazy statues and rituals and things like . . .oh shit, they do have robes and statues and rituals all of those things.
Junior's on Madison Ave. if you want some wings or food (pizza too!), good if you don't want to be downtown, Mahar's is just a few steps away if you want a good beer selection.  If downtown, Hill Street Café for a bar, and great wings.  Enjoy the city!
So... in all your study, you never read his book, ["Mein Kampf"](http://www.nobeliefs.com/hitler.htm), huh? tsk, tsk, tsk. He was both a devout roman catholic and a creationist.
I remember seeing a discussion about this documentary along with this video trailer someone made : http://vimeo.com/9319  It blew my mind at the time, I had to see this documentary. Ended up getting it on VHS from overseas to learn my VHS player couldn't play the damn thing. Eventually some kind person uploaded a DVD Rip of it a year or so later. I wasn't disappointed.  Check out Relentless Enemies. That's also good.  Damn, I'm too high.
Nothing yet, I start with names, then abilities.
I think people like the immersion of dynamic content and not always being able to experience the same content repeatedly. It makes the world they are in feel more real and alive, which I think is really important to most MMO players.
but.... audrey hepburn :3
Trains havn't improved for some companies  Northern Rail just seem to get the pass-me-downs of other companies and charge a stupid amount for rail fare. I'm surprised those trains don't fall off.
You recognize your favorite movie by knowing every second of it.
Of COURSE Jews must consent to practicing their own religion, anything else would be stupid, duh!
Run. I wish I would of done it when I saw the first sign of abuse with my ex. My head told me run but my heart for some reason said stay. Listen to your head. 
You shoulda seem how big it was BEFORE the bear trap!
Have it on blu ray and love watching it everytime.
fuck splashup. that is it.
For Colored Girls: The rape scene and the Lady in Yellow's monologue in the hospital, the scene where the Lady in Brown's boyfriend murders her children, the monologues between the Lady in White and Lady in Orange.  Devdas: Paro's wedding. The heartbreak that Devdas and Paro suffered always brings me to tears.  Why Did I Get Married: When Sheila is talking to her friends in the dressing room about how happy she is with Troy.  Grave of the Fireflies: When Setsuko reveals that she knew that their mother died because their aunt told her.   Forrest Gump: "Forrest, why'd this happen to me? I wanna go home..."
I just wished you worked in my office!! want a job in England babe?
raised edge is right, wouldnt trust them up there without it.
I can understand Coke being Coca-Cola, or Pepsi, or &lt;insert other brand of black colay stuff here&gt;, but Sprite? That's lemonade territory.  edit: I see daemin said the same thing.
Commenting so I can come back to this.  Nothing to see here, move along.
My guess is alcohol. 
the twist in that story, your mom is right and everybody but her is insane and mentally ill
Easy to win 4 v 5... doing it all the time
Sure. You are 20. I'm not saying that your life doesn't suck right now, I'm saying that you have at least 30 more years to find something that sucks more.   Also these next 30 years (statistically speaking) are the years when you'll see your favourite movie, hear the best song you've ever heard and meet the prettiest, smartest, most fun woman you've ever met.   Now you know to not trust a kid. Keep that lesson in mind when making new friendships/romances.   TL;DR You've been served shit by her twice by now - it's time to close that chapter and move on.
  364
Thanks for the comment man. Yeah, I've really been in a bit of a rut for a while. Like I said in my post, I got inspired after seeing The Wall live. I didn't really get inspired, it just moved me so much that I acquired the balls to publish what I had.  Try doing that man, listen to something really great or see a live show that'll blow your mind or something. Try a diet change or travelling for a bit or going a weekend without music, just anything new you know?   I'm sure you've got some good stuff in you, don't worry if it doesn't come out all at once. This was my first post since April.  You'll get inspired again, it *will* happen. And you better post it here on r/treewriting!  Best of luck, I'm a bit uninspired too but you don't have to produce something all the time. Thanks for the kind words too :)
The CPU tells the OS "tell me what instruction is at program counter location X". The OS and the BIOS get that instruction out of memory or from the hard disc and send it to the CPU. The CPU starts working on that instruction, increments its program counter, and tells the OS "tell me what instruction is at program counter location X+1". In general, it will keep incrementing the program counter, until it hits an instruction that creates a loop or a branch, and that will make it calculate the next program counter location differently....it may not just increment to the next one, it could loop backwards or jump somewhere else entirely.   Of course, it's really more complicated than that. The CPU contains local memory called "caches" that may already have the next instructions, because it previously told the OS to give it a bunch of them, figuring it might need them soon.  CPUs are fiendishly complicated so that they can be very efficient. But everything they do is implemented by fairly simple circuit elements that are individually dumb.   And of course the CPU is actually working on many programs, some simultaneously, and switching back and forth between others. The OS is just a program, but that program helps tell the CPU what other program it should run next.  So the CPU has multiple program counters, and when it runs out of available program counters it stores program counter contents in memory to retrieve them when it needs them again.
I didn't start showing till I was 22 weeks, everyone is different. 
Haha this is so random. Fuck sake of all the players in the world to chose. 
her profile on the image description, name is princessdi
Yesssss, let the butthurt flow through you!
They're little vaginas! :3
Well, I'm truly sorry that I let my frustration slip through.  It wasn't meant to, and it certainly wasn't directed at you.  I'll try to better proofread for sensitivity in the future.
Why is this so awkward?? It's hilarious, and if it's your cd you know it's coming. I guess it would be awkward if I was the only one laughing and gf thought it wasnt funny...but then id probably look for a new gf with a sense of humor.
TF2 is a better example of buyable items being sidegrades instead of upgrades.  Tribes Ascend has plenty of buyable weapons that are just straight up better. 
He would have to tell you -- otherwise how could you carry out the punishment? He pretty much has to tell you what is expected of you, at least in the US.
Welcome to the club
... no, it's not.   "You're" is a contraction of "you are".   "Your" is:   * Belonging to or associated with the person or people that the speaker is addressing. ("What is your name?")  * Belonging to or associated with any person in general. ("The sight is enough to break your heart.")  * Used to denote someone or something that is familiar or typical of its kind. ("I'm just your average Joe" or "She is one of your chatty types")  * Used when addressing the holder of certain titles. ("Your Majesty" or "Your Eminence")  So thanks for proving to everyone here what a fucking idiot you really are. 
&gt;that makes absolutely no sense   I'm not sure I can simplify it. I'll try.    Player versus Player (PvP) is **not** the only way to play online with other people.    For instance, I almost exclusively Sunbro in the Burg. I like it. I like helping people. I play well with others.  Some people don't like playing nicely with others. They like to cause pain, suffering and misery. They thrive on that. They send retarded messages to people who kill them. They invade for PvP action (rather than co-op).   So to reiterate:   People who "play nice with others" either sunbro or (try to) engage in honorable "duels".   People who "don't play nice" engage in PvP to fuck people's shit up.  PvP is becoming the default activity for people who don't play nice with others.  For fucks sake your entire post was predicated on spotting this yourself!
Lara Croft vs Indiana Jones  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=XcDaMpHFRCE&amp;feature=related
I thought it was illegal to charge more in late fees than a product is worth.  Or do most companies just do that because it's less douchey?
You and your logic... 
Doc, Guude, Bdubs.
Re: David, Lord of Time  Well, first, the Doctor often can't save people, even people he dearly wishes he could save.  And he never brings them back.  So... yeah, the +1 is basically totally wrong.  The suspend power is *interesting*, and it emphasizes the Timelord aspect, but it's also not something the Doctor /does/.  And the Super-Karn?  Um.  This would be way more appropriate for Rose than for the Doctor, since one of these two people actually sort of more or less fragmented an alternate reality.  ---  Re: Christos, Messiah Figure  Alright, *this* version of 'comes back when out of loyalty' is way better than the previous Doctor, and is almost enough to save the whole card on it's own :)  +1 Superfog is... a bit much, but I can dig it.  Especially since it can only be used on your turn.  Ironically, it means Jesus encourages you to attack wildly.  Not sure if that's intentional or not.  -3 Holy WTF.  Alright, Islandwalk is amusing in this context, but why is Jesus Super-Gideon?  -7: Man, that's a lot of text for 'You win the game'.  The main problem I see with this Jesus is, nothing about him screams *Jesus*.  He doesn't heal the sick (removing Poison or -1/-1 counters), he doesn't redeem, he doesn't teach.  The only thing that conveys his Jesus-ness is the 'if he would die, suspend 3 instead'.  Oh, and Islandwalk.  ---  Re: Tranquility  I actually warmed up to this card as I thought about it- conveying the essentially falling-apart nature of Serenity.  6cmc is way too much for that ability (Hell, Levitation is only 4cmc and way better), but it's not bad.  That said, without the name and the image, I might as easily have guessed that this was the Millinium Falcon- of course, in many ways, Serenity *is* an expy for the Millinium Falcon, so that's not inappropriate really :)
It took forever to load the image so I just had this long suspense... It was like "Oh shit. Oh shit. Oh shit. Oh shit it is. Oh dear god." :(
Thank you! Is your cat an old diabetic whiner, too?
Wonder how he feels about his former team. His next start should be game one against the Padres Thursday.
Forever alone is just such a [classic] (http://www.quickmeme.com/meme/6glm/)
He didn't even blink
Pretty much anything on Fox News.
Storm in the summer?
Well played, Druid of Talon. Fuck I hated that guy in WC3, OP shit with his melee minions swarming around me.
You have crazy scruffy handwriting bro. 
Man, he was intimidating in that film. It's so strange he hasn't taken more roles like that, considering his size and evident anger in that film. You'd think he'd pay some bills doing some action. Even Brad Pitt knocked out Troy.
I went over to Europe last year and my Ipad wouldn't connect to anything (free wifi at airports, pubs, Starbucks as well as home networks). Got to Hong Kong airport and it worked fine again. Never did find out why.
IMO  Wake up, your attitude is backwards. You're more than likely going to struggle and struggle and struggle. ITS FINE TO ASK FOR HELP. Okay? I know this subreddit is for neurotics, but you should know better!  You should seek help. Can you imagine if you actually have a chemical imbalance in your brain? You may end up fighting FOR YEARS against something you have no hope in beating successfully. It's best to get medical treatment for your disorder, they will help you accordingly.  ESPECIALLY now, if you're struggling now, it won't be all shits and giggles at the university. You will be under new stresses in a new environment with new people. My life fell APART when I started college, and all I had to show for it was wasted TIME and MONEY, because I didn't seek adequate treatment. Get help, then do school.
I think it'd be hilarious if there was an Absol at the table with giant stacks of chips
Well, not that I mind if there are no meanings in lyrics. But Im glad that I decided to check out Nickleback despite the hate here. I think Something in your Mouth is a amazing song sound wise.
**I don't give two shits that it's your first rage comic, your comic is bad and you should feel bad**  *Paid for by friends of Harrison Greely III*  [Click here to message the creator](http://i.imgur.com/0V5qY.gif)
You need to give me the exact quote. I'm fluent, not clairvoyent :p
We need more European civs. Why is Scotland not represented? Or Sicily? Or Malta?
I completely agree, I bought my first bike like two months ago a tl1000s and never had any problems, never taken a msf corse and never rode anything else. I don't understand why most of people are so scared of anything bigger than a 250. The owner of this bike is stupid how do you even drop a bike on your first two minutes? Some people just shouldnt ride. 
I've been messing around with the MIDI in and my external Alesis synth on that pedal and haven't had any luck... I don't understand why.  I just plug the keytar directly into the amp and use the effects send/return through the pedal and it works beautifully.  
Your understanding of Islamic culture is bad, and you should feel bad!
Were you trying to fly? You should have taken off from the ground.
mmmmmmmmmmm. I might just have to get a roll when getting my ingredients for my roast today
Iran wants to bring on the 12th imam, and the DPRK is just pissed off at the world in general. Just the thought of driving to work and having my car dying, the traffic lights going out, power going out, my watch, my walkman, and my cell phone dying all at the same instant is terrifying. When/if that happens; I know what happened, and then I'm in "oh shit" mode.  I'm used to worrying about having my ass evaporated by the USSR because I grew up in the age of the cold war, where multiple thousands of nuclear weapons would usher in doomsaday with a 45 miniute warning to get to shelter NOW. Not to where one 350 KT bomb detonated over Kansas at an altitude of 300 miles could knock out the entire western hemisphiere in 1 shot.  Imagine being the unlucky fuck riding the express elevator to his office that stops every 10th floor and you're on the 93rd floor. Unless you take your life into your own hands, and try to make it to safety, your fucked. Imagine being 7 miles above the earth and flyintg trans-contidental, amd all of the sudden your plane goes black while your sitting on the toilet and you start to fall out of the sky. Since no electricity is working, there is no water pressure. Fires rage out of control, and the fire department is overwhelmed. You can't call out trucks either. They don't even start. The city burns down, and there's nothing you can do about it. You cant even evacuate. The radio stations aren't working. Raging fires out of control for weeks on end. Millions of people forced from thier homes. They expect relief, but no relief is coming, because everywhere is like this. Approximatly 50,000 people are in the air at any given time. Imagine 5000 independntly raging fires, with no way at all to put them out. Fires rage out of control, and millions of people are rendered homeles, missing, or dead before the fire rampage is over.  Then you have the aftermath of hundreds of millions of people roaming the countryside in search of food, medicine, and other supplies, most of these people will be dead within the year from lack of essential medicinal services, and the absence of modern hygene. From our population of 340 million, it is expected that 300 million would be dead within the first year. We would be thrown back into the 17th century technology wise. Hundreds of millions of people would be dead, and for what? Because of a large international dick-waving contest. It doesn't seem worth it to me. We need to prevent this horrible outcome. EMP is the most horrifying thing that I can imagine happening. I almost wish for the old days of the soviet union, where only MAD was a concern. At least if they nuked us, we would hit them back. How are we going to hit back if they had 2 EMPs targeted to us, set to detonate 3 miniutes apart? The first one takes out the primary grid. We switch to backups for military, hospitals, and national security. A second one goes off, and takes out the backup systems.  Welcome to the stone age. Like the saying goes, "most people are within 3 missed meals of complete anarchy."  Previous examples where EMP effects have been observed:  Operation Starfish prime, (US nuclear test). Burnt out street lights, dimmed electicity in parts, and completly shut down other areas. Telephone lines melted, as did transformers.  Soviet Test 184 over Kazahstan, (Soviet Union), Burnt out electical lines, fried transformers, an electrical plant caught fire, underground telephone lines were fried. Phones rang because of the pulse. People who picked up the phone were electrocuted.  EMP is a very real phenomenon, and has been well documented. We now have EMP bombs, and we can make them non-nuclear.  http://www.airpower.maxwell.af.mil/airchronicles/cc/apjemp.html  You might want to read these:  Executive Report from the EMP Commission: http://www.empcommission.org/docs/empc_exec_rpt.pdf  Commission to Assess The Threat to The United States from Elecromagnetic Pulse, (EMP), attack Regarding the Critical National Infrastructures Report: http://www.empcommission.org/docs/A2473-EMP_Commission-7MB.pdf
CUZ
Christopher Lee. He does a fantastic reading of [The Raven.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=MyxsPHWSxlY "It's really great for falling asleep to.")
Argh. That has to be the most disappointing candy in the history of the universe.  6 year old me: "Wow, that gum looks so awesome!"  *Pops gum in mouth*  6 year old me: "Awesome flavor!"  *2 seconds later...*  [Aaaaand it's gone](http://youtu.be/hSsViDWViX4?t=3s).
You are my favorite novelty account.
If Bush won every recount why did it have to go to the supreme court for a decision?  Despite decades of prior decisions in which Scalia favored states rights, in this one specific case, he suddenly reversed and was like "WTF are states rights?"
Thanks for coming clean. You guys should just down-vote the link, not his comment.  Ah-Well... You get an upvote for honesty.
Oh S**T I've been playing this for almost two years
Fair enough.  As a complete aside, which Avengers would you suggest I pick up and start reading? I was huge on the Heroes Reborn Avengers for years but with New, Secret, and the Ultimates I have no idea which team I'm supposed to start with.
It's incredibly presumptuous of you to assume they didn't believe in what they were fighting for.
I'm 15, so I suppose I hit Underclass Hero's intended audience a bit better than you, which might be why I like it quite a bit. However, I don't think they were trying to remake an album from 10+ years ago. They simply were playing more within the genre of Pop Punk. Brownsound left because he wanted to do metal, and was the main influence for their heavier works up until he left, so it makes sense that their album immediately after his departure wouldn't be as heavy.  As for Deryck Whibley trying and failing to write a punk album, I don't think it's ALL bad. I quite liked screaming bloody murder, and the album had a couple of other songs that were pretty okay in my opinion. But music is all relative, so it's probably fairly different for you.
Uh... this calls for two tablespoons of Fuck No
You can really go two ways on a budget: 1. Increase your dps with crit/crit dmg items.  2. Increase your block chance substantially so you can survive to slug it out for eternity.   Option 1 is by far the more fun option and the path most tank barbs are now pursuing.
In my opinion a good idea would be that the taunt heals you, in fact the pyro eats his lollypop.  Would look wierd in non-pyrovison tho.
Their group story writing was fun. I would miss that.  Otherwise, your right.
In the US or in China?  In China this (and a great number of outright scams) is extremely common and the government doesn't care at all.
It's been motzei Shabbas here for some time, but I just saw this, and I'd like to make two notes on this:  One, regarding the death penalty, I see no reason to see gay rape as more likely to get the death penalty than consensual gay sex, although for anything to get the death penalty, it would have to be absolutely premeditated, and performed despite in situ warning and virtual indefensibility (complete indefensibility -- ie all judges agreeing despite the strenuous defence -- would result in acquittal).  Two, I don't think that Conservative explanation holds any water in terms of Orthodoxy.
MY PARENTS ARE LAWYERS AND WE HAVE A WELL, A SWIMMIN HOLE, AND I HAVE SHINY SILVER PICK UP TRUCK
"God is in the rain..."
I hate when someone talks about breathing, then I start to concentrate on breathing. See now you're doing it.
Thanks a lot! Sorry for the delayed answer, my reddit page was messed up. Thanks a lot for the help and sorry for the trouble. :3
Brine shrimp. 
You can but with the Gold Blocks it has better effects.
[Mirai Nikki](http://myanimelist.net/anime/10620/Mirai_Nikki_%28TV%29) fits the 3 things you mentioned. Mirai Nikki and Another aired around the same time.
Or maybe he's just trying to be acute. 
Mauro fucking Rosales.
Then by that logic, it doesn't matter if you're using the name at all. You're not referencing a real person, so you might as well be saying "Johnny Doctor". Might as well stick to what you already say.
Now I'm a bit confused, I don't *think* they need to eat crickets but if all the links say so then maybe... I don't know, all I do know is you can buy powder that contains nutrients for juveniles and for older beardies(yes, specifically for beardies) in most pet shops, I'm pretty sure feeding him crickets won't do any harm but as far as I know, it doesn't do anything good either, it's kind of neutral...  Can't find anything backing up my teachers and zookeepers but at least one of them is world famous or some shit so I guess I'll take his word for it...  **TL;DR;** You can feed him crickets if you want but I don't think it will do anything, I recommend something like [this](http://www.reptillagret.se/terracalvirepvitd370g-p-5424.html) to go with the veggies.
Read the FAQ or Recommended reading on the sidebar.
They owned 100% of all long distance lines.  But for the record, in economics, a monopoly does not need to be 100% market share, in a classical sense yes, but for economics, it's when one company has enough control of the market that they can act as if they have zero competition.  DeBeers is a good example, they owned so much of the supply and production of diamonds that they owned the market and set the price.  It didn't matter that a few streams in Africa produced diamonds that were being picked out by the locals.  Those locals had zero power in the market.
I didn't start smart casting until I was ~1500 ELO with ~1200 games under my belt.
When are they going to make sequencer-type units like these that can handle triplets?  Interesting time signatures and rhythmic choices would go a long way in helping people's "homegrown techno" not all sound the same... Beeps n' boops in 4/4/4/4/4/4... all day.
That sounds like a Plan.. Maybe one of the next Fridays I'll be down to go there.
I had a really tough time in a thread on DoA on my first day there, if it weren't for a LOVELY friendly and kind LOCAL forum, I might have just decided to keep this hobby to myself.   However, that said, there's a plethora of great information, tips on where to find clothing items &amp; prop, tips on how to MAKE clothing and props, etc... and I've really learned a lot there. (Oh god the tutorial threads on restringing alone are worth it.)   also by sticking too the "discussion about doll type X" kind of threads I've actually made friends, made contacts for making things for other people, getting things made. etc.   So IMHO Join, but lurk in threads for a long time before daring to voice an opinion in a particular thread.  Some of the people there are viscous, nasty and elitist, but they don't represent the majority of people in the communities or in the hobby. 
This can backfire on you when applying for certain jobs. My husband interviewed for a job at a nuclear plant, researched the plant, the equipment they used, the type of fuels they were currently using and those they were transitioning to, etc. I have no idea how he found all of that info, but when they asked "Well, do you have any questions for us", he let loose with a bunch of technical questions about the intricacies of their operations (he had prepared well for a technical interview, but they were having an HR mixup at the time and he got the basic "are you human" interview). The manager freaked out, asked him how he knew all of that, and was horrified to find out that all of that information was available online if you know where to look.  He got the job, but I think in a security-conscious environment, they really freaked out. 
MMJ business more than doubled under him though in his first two years.  http://medicalmarijuanamarkets.com/see-change-strategy-releases-the-state-of-the-medical-marijuana-markets-2011-the-first-ever-investor-grade-analysis-of-the-medical-marijuana-markets-in-the-u-s/
By: [elegantfeatherduster](http://elegantfeatherduster.tumblr.com/post/23954591352/elegantfeatherduster-round-two-im-opening)
Damn, dat first one ! It's amazing !
That 46% number is bollocks. You mean to say pays no income tax. But those people absolutely pay federal payroll tax ( assuming they work and get paid).
Something about a water-like liquid that doesn't seem satisfying.  I'd feel much happier with a foul smelling, syrupy mixture e.g. the nail polish.   I used Compound W when I was a kid, and it didn't work but I never really stuck with it.  I finally just got them freezed off with liquid nitrogen at the dermatologist. I had a pea sized one on my knee 10 years ago and I just cut it off with a straight razor.  Little bleeding, but the bastard never came back.
A lot of lax is core and conditioning. Sprints, hills/stairs, distance should all be a part of your weekly routine (for every position) getting more intense as you get to high school and beyond. For your core, pushups and sit-ups (or full-body crunches) daily. Add in other exercises as needed.
I am by no means a tinfoil hat wearing conspiracy theorist, I happen to spend a good amount of my free time reading and researching this topic and have done for about five years. The UK government and intelligence agencies are actively preparing for major civil unrest in the face of the coming energy crisis - this is well documented.  I'd explain my thoughts and conclusions in far greater detail if I didn't think I'd be downvoted by pollyannas who'd rather not hear it, and dismissed with inane jpegs.
Also, in episode 2, Goku's special technique is a [Full Nelson](http://youtu.be/aBm_2IUn4MU#t=05m38s).
Thanks! :)
Funny. I once asked a girl if she went on Reddit after she showed me a pic of a bong I had seen on r/trees. She said she had never heard of it, but then she brought up 4chan. 
I think most doctors tell you in general not to get pregnant again after any type of delivery, that your body needs time to heal from pregnancy. That's what I was told at least from my doctors, and that there are more risks to women who get pregnant within a year of delivery (any type). I haven't done the research myself though so I'm not 100% sure, it's just what my OB told me. 
I stacked attack speed with no damage or crit.  It was logical to me. Two hits/second=more DPS than 1 slightly stronger hit/second.
customize your hotkeys, trust me, your apm will increase to over 100 if you customize and master your hotkeys.  also you only need to press space to go to last notification, it's no different from SC1. Most of the things you could do in SC1 are in SC2 but much of it has been improved such as way points, rally points, control groups and so on.
http://www.affordablecarinsuranceinflorida.org/  Affordable Car Insurance in Florida  Car insurance In Florida: What's Being Done To lower The Expenses?
(NKJV) 1 Peter 3:15 But sanctify the Lord God in your hearts, and always be ready to give a defense to everyone who asks you a reason for the hope that is in you, with meekness and fear;  *(This is the reason for the hope that is in me:)* ___  [1] http://amazingdiscoveries.tv/c/9/Science/  [2] http://amazingdiscoveries.tv/c/2/Total_Onslaught/  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=RqecQNF459E  John 14:29 And now I have told you before it come to pass, that, when it is come to pass, ye might believe.  2 Peter 1:19 We have also a more sure word of prophecy...  2Pe 1:20 Knowing this first, that no prophecy of the scripture is of any private interpretation.  2Pe 1:21 For the prophecy came not in old time by the will of man: but holy men of God spake as they were moved by the Holy Ghost.  Revelation 12:17 And the dragon was wroth with the woman, and went to make war with the remnant of her seed, which keep the commandments of God, and have the testimony of Jesus Christ.  Revelation 19:10 for the testimony of Jesus is the spirit of prophecy. ___ Why do we believe? Why do we believe this strange and archaic book? Why not the Koran or why not the words of Buddha or why not all those New Age Occult books? Why not Thelema? Why not The Book of the Law which Aleister Crowley claimed was dictated to him by Satan himself? Why not the Satanic Bible by Anton LeVey? Why this strange book called the Bible?   This is why I believe. I believe because of the prophecies of Daniel and the Revelation, especially those of Daniel chapter 2 and 7 and also the last phophecy of chapter 9. I believe because of archaeological evidence that had time and time again vindicated the Bible. All of the history of the Old and New Testament I believe to be true. I believe because true science supports the events of the Bible, including a world-wide flood. Because if there were a world-wide flood, what would we expect to find? We would expect to find billions of dead things, laid down by water, all over the earth. We would expect to see a chalk layer of calcium carbonate formed by dead marine life on every single continent in the world. And what do we find? Billions of dead things fossilized by water, all over the earth. And we find that chalk layer of dead marine life and it is the only layer that is present on every single continent on earth. And that can only mean one thing, that all the continents in the world were are one point, underwater. And we would expect to find monuments to such a disaster, like the Grand Canyon. What has been believed to have taken millions of years we have seen formed by floods in minutes, and hardened to rock in months. I believe because the devils also believe, and tremble, and have attacked God in the mystery and occult religions since ancient Egypt and since ancient Babylon. I believe because there have been people who have been involved in the occult who have come forward with what they have been through. I believe because of the deceptions and the evidence and proofs in the other religions of well-known ones and less known ones, such as Mormonism, which has great ties to Freemasonry, and Thelema of Aleister Crowley and Scientology of L. Ron Hubbard, two men who were close friends. I believe because of these strange and hidden truths. She is called **MYSTERY**, BABYLON THE GREAT, THE MOTHER OF HARLOTS AND ABOMINATIONS OF THE EARTH. She is hidden in the occult and mystery religions. Throughout all of ancient Israel, time and time again, the children of Israel forgot the LORD their God, and went a whoring after other gods, such as Baal, and worshiped and lit incense to their gods and built their idols and altars in the groves of the forests. These ancient occult religions still exist today. I believe because of these strange and hidden truths which is there if only we would seek it.   "And have no partnership with the unfruitful works of darkness, but rather expose them. For it is shameful even to speak of those things being done by them in secret." - Ephesians 5:11,12  "For there is nothing covered, that shall not be revealed; neither hid, that shall not be known." - Luke 12:2.  "And ye shall know the truth, and the truth shall make you free." - John 8:32  http://amazingdiscoveries.tv/c/2/Total_Onslaught_-_English/
They're released, I just got back from Vons supermarket near PB in San Diego and they had them, it's an absolutely incredible beer.
Thank you.  I wish him all the best.
1,280 x 1,024 is the resolution. 19 inch.
Based on mod response it won't.. I would need to make flyers and shit.. I could probably poster them through out the lightrail areas to save gas.
Is there a provision to force a governor to apply a federal law? I mean, I suppose there is, what's the point of having a federal government if any dumbfuck with a bit of political power can ignore it?
No, road wheels are too small and the front wheel there is too high compared to the T-34. It's likely a converted T-55 or similar. I think a VT-55 which tends to be the base for a lot of Panther replicas (since there's less existing stuff to move around).  Here's a company who has a very similar conversion for sale:  http://pictures.ww2mv.com/GalleryFilmstrip.aspx?gallery=1186893&amp;mid=53232319&amp;mt=Photo&amp;ci=008
2013 is the year. 15 is internal development version, I believe.
http://i.imgur.com/X7Zp1.jpg
Did you dump him? Sounds like you have a lot of hostility towards him, which is completely understandable in my opinion.
Hello! I am a bot who posts transcriptions of Quickmeme links for anybody who might need it. &gt;Title: "If a mandate was the solution, we could try that to solve homelessness by mandating everybody buy a house." -Obama 2008 &gt;Meme: Mind Trick Obama &gt;* THIS IS NOT THE CHANGE  &gt;* YOU WERE LOOKING FOR. &gt;^[[Direct](http://i.qkme.me/3pxbs6.jpg)] ^[[Background](http://imgur.com/zQfN9)] ^[[Translate](http://translate.google.com/#auto||THIS+IS+NOT+THE+CHANGE+-+YOU+WERE+LOOKING+FOR.)] See the [FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/comments/o426k/faq_for_the_qkme_transcriber_bot/) for more info.  (OP: You don't need to do anything differently next time, I'm just doing my job.)
The school I applied to and didnt include the transcript was a private school. The transcript was actually from a college in Ireland. Maybe that's why they didnt really care, although a transcript is a transcript.   If the school you're applying to really wants that transcript, the one that you dont feel too great about, just take the time to write and explain what happened. That's what I would do.
Hope he has scissors to cut his hair.
Hello! I am a bot who posts transcriptions of Quickmeme links for anybody who might need it. &gt;Title: Futurama Fry not sure &gt;Meme: Futurama Fry &gt;* NOT SURE IF I SUCK AT MEME  &gt;* OR JUST BAD TIMING &gt;^[[Direct](http://i.qkme.me/3pxcxe.jpg)] ^[[Background](http://imgur.com/8WooN)] ^[[Translate](http://translate.google.com/#auto||NOT+SURE+IF+I+SUCK+AT+MEME+-+OR+JUST+BAD+TIMING)] See the [FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/comments/o426k/faq_for_the_qkme_transcriber_bot/) for more info.  (OP: You don't need to do anything differently next time, I'm just doing my job.)
Maybe it's not, but that eyeliner says otherwise! Your eyes are stunning!   Maybe play around with color? I see nothing wrong. Just get creative!
[Renegade Rows](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=w34MLCoaC-Q&amp;feature=player_detailpage#t=179s) Are a good core and back excercise
Garlic, artichoke, olive, all of them are tasty. Except roasted red pepper. I can't seem to like that one.
"And I am Telling You" is forever associated with Fresh Prince for me. One of the absolute best tv moments. NOW YOU WAIT ONE MINUTE UNCLE PHIL! 
Such billboards don't have to change minds to do something important.   1) They let atheists, or people on the verge of it, who don't know of any other atheists know that there are others out there. That can be a *very* important thing for some people.  2) They shift the Overton window, which alters the ability of atheists to achieve things all over.  You seem to have a very narrow idea of what things atheist billboards might do.  If it was the *only* thing such organizations were doing, maybe there'd be some kind of argument about more effective directions.
No one will read this but whatever, I'm drunk and want to rant about philosophy. this is a really subtle thing in the religion debate, and most people miss it, it's essentially the clock maker argument, sorry if this is long.  a)**aside**) I'm not convinced it is *terribly* fine tuned.  Simulations have been run(or so i've been told) varying the basic 4 forces and atoms have a tendency to go to hell at weird force constants.  But I've yet to have someone tell me, that we've tested *many* configurations, it may be that there are configurations weird to us that work perfectly well for life, and there are a lot of them, but I'll argue with out this for the next part, since it's mostly speculation.  b)**Suppose the universe is fine tuned**,  that is that this is one of the few configurations that works for life.  There are a lot of reasons that the universe could be the way it is.  God is just one of them.  Maybe we just got fucking lucky.  Maybe there was a previous universe with life that engineered this one.  Maybe there's infinitely many universes so there was bound to be one supporting life. Maybe I was an entity before the universe and I farted the right conditions because interuniversal Taco Bell has the right mix of molecules in their interuniversal 1/2 pound cheesy double beef burrito.  The point is there are infinitely many reasons the universe *could have* wound up the way it is.  God is just one of them.  If you find any other evidence other than "we don't know why it happened, so it must be god"(or an intelligent design), then there should be discussion, but this question does not entail any of that evidence. 
I glitches out of the house while spawning. Raiding starry military tents w/o a gun is scary.
Cut it thin and use it as fajitas on the grill! I like to add a little Bolner's Fiesta Fajita seasoning, it's just what you use in Texas. Add some fresh lime juice, crush up some peeled kiwis and mash it into the meat, then the juice of a large orange. Marinate for up to 4 hours then grill!!
Is your parental leave FMLA or something different? 
Well that sucks. 60% the first year? Of what $5k?
The walk wasn't far at all. I'm arthritic and had no issues. A++ would stay again.
The opposition's scheme is rubbish too. Fucking "Liberals" my ass, they talk plenty of nice talk about letting the market work, but then everything they do is just a watered down version of whatever Labour's doing.
I'm only in Lewes for part of the summer. July and late August I'll be in NCC for classes.
yes yes and yes.   The Extended Experience stuff has not been mentioned for a long time, I wonder if they've dropped it for release?   I would feel very nervous about going into the retail game with those things untested :O
you incorrectly use witch hunt in sentences in exactly the same way that TiR did
If they sold this in the U.S., it would have to have a warning on it.
**A clever Haiku?**  **Not something I can do,**  **The good ones argon.**   *I need a life, maybe I should get out more.*
Did anyone tasted dog already ? I wonder how it tastes.
I know an old lady who keeps in shape. She must be around that age. She goes to a Military Fitness class that I have been going to for the last 3 years. She's been there since the first one, and when the original instructor had to leave for another job, her son took over the class.   She does other classes through out the week, and even asked me if I wanted to play tennis the other day.   It's truly amazing how long you can keep going for if you keep trying.
&gt; Bloody underwear   *shudders*
it's like....a parfait...
You're entire argument is based on the low amount of injuries caused by the Saints.  The issue isn't how many injuries they actually caused, but that there seems to be evidence showing that injuries would be rewarded.  Whether that actually resulted in more injuries is irrelevant, what is relevant is the willingness to reward it.  Also, answer me this.  What exactly does the NFL have to gain by fabricating a scandal that paints the entirety of the league in a bad light?  What does Goodell gain from a 'smear campaign'?  Nothing but the potential for bad press.
Fuck, that's beautiful. Dem inlays, especially the headstock one.
US has killed far more foreign civilians in the last decade than US and China combined.   China maintains a strict policy of non-intervention, and letting countries decide their own fates. You would think that reddit, with so many fans of Star Trek, would have more respect for the country that adopts the closest policy to the Federations prime directive.
The double equals is a comparison operator   if x == y:  the single equal is an assignment operator   x = True  from your description it sounds like you might be trying to use the comparison operator to make an assignment.
Have you seen the price of high end items (ie trinity gloves etc)? 3 weeks ago they cost half the price. "No effect on the average player" Sure, maybe right now as people are stuck in a1 inferno. But as soon as these players want to progress the "average" player will be fucked by inflation. The botters are the ones finding the majority fo the "items worth selling" and they're the ones making the profits. Dont kid yourself.
It's a common misconception that Israel came into existence as a result of the Holocaust, when in fact that is not at all the case.
[This](http://i.imgur.com/TdFZ5.jpg) was after I shaved my head for childhood cancer research. This is one of the only pics I have of us where I'm not in heels. 
No I am not saying that, I like to think I am a moral person and I try to translate that across to the internet  so when I come across a comment that is blatantly disrespectful to someone for no good reason I naturally want to get to the bottom of it. 
Why is that a flaw? He's a paladin, and a loyal one too. Viconia whether genuinely 'evil' or not unabashedly opposes nearly every single view and moral Keldorn holds dear. If they *didn't* end up fighting sooner or later that would be much more of a flaw in my mind as it just wouldn't make sense given the characters.  Knowing that these sort of violent situation are possible is also what makes playing around and finding out how characters interact so much fun. For example try putting Korgan and Mazzy in a group together, you might be surprised at the results.  It's that sort of interaction between NPC I miss in a lot of rpg these days.
Knock knock?  Who's there?  Nazi interrogator.  Nazi interrogator who?  *WE ASK THE QUESTIONS AROUND HERE!!*
Mine was, "Never Eat Soggy Weiners"
looks like you hurt their feelings. and yeah, this is animal abuse
please let this not be the top comment when a euro player posts
usually you need to stay out of clubs and bar/clubs... smaller local places are usually better than the mulcaheys or nutty irishmen. Babylon and farmingdale are usually good, the nautical mile in free port and select bars in huntington on select nights are also ok. Don't forget though, we do hail from long island, everyone's got a chip on their shoulder and we are the fathers of the guido movement (thank the lord that's almost run its course). I usually don't give a fuck personally, seeing as i don't go to clubs or bar/clubs.
They just went 5 laps between commercial breaks. Not cool.  Also, I hope someone can get up there and challenge the 18. 
OKC has better odds than Miami? The Atlanta Hawks have a worse chance than the Trail Blazers? Minnesota's odds were **25.5?**? This man was just fucking with us
Oh gawd. Watched this movie during work, thinking I could handle it. Was doing pretty good until that scene with him before surgery.  Nopenopenope. Onions. 
You can gain strength without gaining muscle but typically only as a beginner and there is a limit to what you will gain. The gains wi be limited to what your nervous system can produce with your existing muscle. Try progressively lifting weights and see where you can get. There are also advanced diets like leangains which can help add muscle while not adding too much if any weight. 
Over all, and not knowing anything about your character, personal style, and lifestyle (which form the all-important context to which your wardrobe should respond), it's not bad. Narrower jeans will look less sloppy.  Now show us something that's not black monochrome. That's the next step of style maturity: learning how to do something other than black. There's a whole world of color, pattern, texture, interplay, *character* out there.  How about something non-"jeans-and-a-t-shirt" that involves color? (Extra points for pattern.) With that project, you may find that you're painted into a corner with black shoes and bag (and to a lesser extent, black jeans), as color combinations will be more difficult with those pieces than with brown leathers.
The ending was handled very well. It made a lot more sense as a movie, and was essentially the same thing happening, just more practical for a film audience. Very underrated film, a lot of people didnt like it because they didnt understand it or were expecting a cookie cutter, over the top hollywood action blockbuster.
On brighthouse in central florida with the same issue for a day and a half. when going to i.imgur.com. DNS resolves fine and the host pings, but whenever i try to go to the site in a browser I get Connection closed by remote server. Connection to the same url using tor or either of my phones over their 3g connection works fine. Brighthouse support claims it must be my router but they're just reading from a script. 
your mothers ass.
My uncle was fortunate to pick up one of the few TRG-21s released to the public. That thing is awesome.
tl;dr: Gene wanted him to be Kirk II
She keeps going back to him too.
judicial review: A court's authority to examine an executive or legislative act and to invalidate that act if it is contrary to constitutional principles.  &gt;*Article 3 Section 2 of the US Constitution*  &gt;**The judicial power shall extend to** all cases, in law and equity, arising under this Constitution, **the laws of the United States**, and treaties made, or which shall be made, under their authority;--to all cases affecting ambassadors, other public ministers and consuls;--to all cases of admiralty and maritime jurisdiction;--to controversies to which the United States shall be a party;  This seems to tell me that this power was not establish via president but rather by the constitution.
Your problem is you hate women.  I don't and I never will, even if one or more of them don't treat me like I think I should be treated.  That's how a *man* behaves.
By antitheist, you are against those who believe in a higher power of some sort, correct?  Mind if I ask why?  Other than in some political issues, what others believe has no effect on you. If it is entirely political, then you should advocate for separation of church and state through your congressmen, which is not upheld to the standards it should be, at least in the USA.  I can understand where you are coming from, though.  
Funny story. I worked with an electrician who was hired to wire this rich but really snobby guy's house. I'm not quite sure what happened between them, but the rich guy fired the electrician. As payback the electrician wired in a GFCI outlet underneath the insulation between the joists in the crawlspace and as far away from the entrance as possible. That GFCI was on the range's circuit and I've heard it took them weeks to find it.
We have a distributed DB that isn't file based. We call it a file system. :-)  It sounds like you're describing a slightly new UI on top of the existing file system.   &gt; You still could access every piece of information via some general browsing application if you really want.  We call that a file browser. I'm not sure what you're proposing. How do you "access every piece of information via some general browsing application" with no need for files?
1 rec for a crate 19?
Is this a post more for /r/assholes? I just thought that the user laughing about the kid's dead father, troll account or not, was pretty bad.
Staff of Apocalypse was all you needed... I miss that game.
&gt;64%  &gt;barely acceptable  ...?
It is. Mkbhd confirmed it in a YouTube comment on his channel. Duck yeah.
It seems like there you either have a ton of money or you have nothing. I saw people shitting in the streets. Little three year old kids were taught to beg tourist for money. Dead dogs, people digging for food in giant trash piles. It was pretty rough.
When was this?   Fuck, I move to New York because cool shit is always happening here, and then I fucking miss all the cool shit!
Personally I like to do 20-30 but 15 is definitely fine. Anything really is fine unless you choose to break your Let's Plays down to 3 minute parts. The problem lies with people who want to know when they have to change the video and the information extracted from the video. For instance audience retention differs greatly from a 3 minute to a 30 minute video. It's nice to keep a constant video length because it helps others view a series and helps you analyze the feedback better.
And I'm Pansexual. What do you want a cookie? Because I do. :3
I got off easy after having read most of these...  I decided to go to this college at the last minute.  So, I ended up getting assigned to room with whoever happened to have space left.  It ended up being an international student from China.  The guy kept broccoli in the top drawer of his dresser.  Drawer #2 was rice.  As soon as he discovered Walmart he bought a steamer, and from then on everything I owned smelled like steamed vegetables.  His English wasn't too great either... So, he kept a TV on at all times, with the subtitles going, so that he could learn more vocabulary and hear the pronunciation.  Hours and hours a day of soaps and whatever else was on.  Thought I had it rough... Glad I'm not the rest of you.   :o)
For anyone wondering, Brave is good.
I loved that mod, shame people stopped playing it after 2 weeks.  And the soundtrack is really worth buying.
okay, well how about for future reference.
Thank you Dan for your support. Sadly, I don't typically fit into r/atheism, BECAUSE of people like this. If I'm ever in this subreddit, it's usually to pick the low-hanging fruit to submit to /r/magicskyfairy or /r/circlebroke. Come and pay a visit.  Lighting edit: I see you've already posted a few times in /r/circlebroke. Why do *you* still come on here?
http://imgur.com/omNxO
I'll probably spent all day playing, but I won't sacrifice sleep this time. I'll also pay a bit more attention to things like food and drink, which I forgot a few times during the beta weekend. I expect I'll be just as likely to completely lose track of time, though.  As for actual gameplay, I already took the time to savor things during the BWE, so I don't think my pace in the game will change very much. The only difference will probably be that I'll take more time to unlock weapon skills each time I get a new one I can use. During the beta and stress test, I skipped a few in the interest of time.
'Mystery Men' was a box office flop and critically panned. It makes me wanna lash out with every limb, like the octopus who plays the drums.
I`m a newly converted in beliver of pink packages, but this ... WOW ... I`ll wrap myself in pink if you`ll come running for me :P :D
Maybe it's just me, but I've always liked the tuner/race car box art over the standard super car look. As soon as the R8 popped up and then the 458, it just felt a little more generic. I'd like to see a throwback for FM5!
I hit it every now and then just to see who I can count on just in case I really need them. 
This post is actually a screenshot from your video
I believe most pastors will tell you that they were killed for lying to God (or Peter). Selling their land was voluntary on their part. 
I hate you.   On another note, I should play Amnesia. I've only seen gameplay videos, and it looks absolutely horrifying/marvellous :D
See, that's why you need more space. Cows take up a lot of room.
Okay wasn't exactly sure who you were addressing. Sorry
Sorry. I swear you sound like the sweetest guy...  But that old fling, made problems. Don't blame him, blame your girlfriend. I have ALOT of guys after me. I have zero self confidence so It doesn't even matter. But they flirt with me all the time. My boyfriend and I have sex once a month at most becauae he's always with friends. and yet, I never flirt back. I'm losing my attraction to him aswell, but I still love him, and would NEVER do that.   What she's doing is wrong. 
&gt;I don't mean to offend anyone but in general, she's just not my type. We wouldn't mesh. I also don't want a girlfriend right now.  * Tell *her* this rather than Reddit. * A firm 'no' and a brief thirty second explanation will help. * Don't give her a hug and tell her that you're sorry. This will confuse matters. * There isn't a 'kind' way of doing it, so just do it. Be sincere, not frivolous, and understand that she'll still probably hang around you for a bit in hopefulness   To all of OP's IRL friends, don't be a jerk to her, or to him.
Were's Marcus Fenix...
Heh, she has the moulting lines that our rabbit used to have. It was always a telltale sign summer was coming when it started behind his head.
Sounds like he may be a bit further down the spectrum, and this may be his thing. It's probably not intentional but any time there is silence his anxiety is probably starting to rise and these type of outbursts are his misguided/compulsive attempt to maintain a social connection.  Silence can be very akward for anybody, if they are ASD it can be 10x-100x worse.   One of the first girlfriends I had literally had to tell me that it was "ok not to talk all the time".   Try teaching him some new non-racist jokes and explain that if he does it with the wrong people, he's likely to be ostracized or even assaulted.
&gt;empirical evidence from schizophrenics  Circumstantial, i think you mean (IE completely rubbish. I can see auras you know? So can all my friends. Therefore auras exist). And yes, while it may give relief from schizophrenia, that does not mean it doesn't cause it  &gt;Correlation does not equal causation.  Not necessarily, however you can't take a strong correlation, put your hands blindly over your ears, and shout "this isn't happening, this isn't happening"  Its much better to investigate the relationship between the two, and there are studies which suggest that marijuana does in fact independently correlate to schizophrenia with confounding factors taken into effect
If your uni course does not have a compulsory industrial year, there is the year in employment scheme -might be called something else, depends what uni you're in. There's also loads of paid graduate programs too.
Batman can grab any tit he wishes...because he's the Bat.
Your sister's a dog.
Agreed.  When I got hit by a car while riding my bike and got my wrist broken and a vertebrae crushed to pieces I first yelled "why didn't you stop?!" and then tried to get up so as to better tell the guy off.  That's when I found out I couldn't get up.  
Sorry, but no. I kept my game face on for the photos.
I try to. 
LeVar Burton- Reading Rainbow. Gay Island has rainbows.
I hope they keep praying maybe now it gives us enough time to, in the great words of Sam Beckett, "Set right things which once went wrong".
Not trolling, but what is the sale for? Will EVERYTHING on steam be on sale, or only valve games?  Also, is there any news about HL3, or are people just joking about it?
This was significantly after, but, when my mom was 17, she was on a bus on her way to California and this guy was hitting on her and offering to buy her breakfast or something. She finds out that he JUST got out of prison for murder. 
I've always pronounced it "pid-jee-ot" because my older brother pronounced it that way, as well as the Pokemon Stadium games and the anime. But I can see why someone would pronounce it "pid-jit" because of the name's and family's relation to the pigeon, which would of course suggest pronunciation similar to "pid-jit."
Yes because Californian's don't get taxed enough.  That is the problem.  California is a model for what happens when public sector union have almost absolute control over every aspect of the state.  
Must..... stop..... clicking..... Spiderman gifs...... AHHHHHHH!
If their primary goal is to fly a passenger jet into the stadium, I'd think one their primary steps they'd need to take would be to deal with anything that could stop them. Some isolated AAMs would be an easy target, so they would be the first thing they'd go for.   Seriously, what difference does it make it's a military target? A decent sized bomb would take care of the building along with any guards.
Oh, I see.  If we can't fix all the problems, then let's fix none of the problems.  Awesome idea.
lol nope i just let the pig sit there cause its close to my house
&gt; US support for Israel began in earnest before the rise of the Religious Right in American politics.  It began elsewhere, but it remains such an issue in part because of that.  &gt; Yeeeah I think you're a little confused here. Again, who "gave" the land? Who dissolved the colony? Who divided up the state?  The Brits and the UN. I'm really not sure what point you're trying to make here. If I'm wrong then correct me. This line of questioning doesn't get me anywhere if I'm just not giving you the answer you want.
...wow
Awesome
Mahna Mahna?
On reddit, there is a CSS class for when a username is shown. We can use this to give you an image next to your name!
When I was about 7-8 I thought women got pregnant through falacio. I just thought it made more sense because gravity and what not. At that age a vagina was unexplored territory so for all I knew it didn't even exist.
Acording to TB he didn't even threaten to sue aperently he just asked him to change it (no law stuf involved)   Ye i think its prety good thou the title should be changed, its just asking for trouble.
I like to think that this is what Mr. Clean ejaculates. Awkward? Yeah...
Such a fun assassin champ to play.  I love just being able to burst down enemy carries.  I rarely ever play him as my team usually has mid taken care of and he's pretty situational due to being a melee mage.  Fizz is a tricky champion to wrap your head around but once you learn how to use him...  Playing aggressively on fizz is extremely rewarding.  During laning you should be looking to kill your lane opponent whenever possible or pushing to their tower so you can gank another lane or secure objectives.  I like to level R&gt;E&gt;W&gt;Q as E gives you huge burst damage and wave clearing power.  When going in on an opponent usually a W+Q combo is the preferred method with E used for escaping or follow-up damage.  Though personally I sometimes hop onto them with E first the Q(W) through them or to a minion to escape.  If you hop right behind them you can dash the full distance of your q back towards your tower.  The damage on this combo is insane and will easily drop a squishy enemy by half health or more even during the early game.  His ult cam be tricky to land on moving opponents.  I find it best to use one of your gap closers first then ult them point blank to ensure it hits.  So usually my full burst combo is E&gt;AA&gt;R&gt;AA&gt;W&gt;AA/Q.  Sometimes you may not be able to AA between each of your skills but if you have sheen or lich bane, spacing out your auto attacks in this way maximizes your damage.  For runes I use mpen reds, hp/lvl yellows, flat MR blues, and flat AP quints.  A lot of players prefer the AP/level blues on fizz and they defnitely work well but I feel the MR is necessary to mitigate lane harass.  Movement speed quints are also a very viable alternative if you are against a skill shot champ so you can weave through the minions with your passive.  Though I find that with two gap closers MS isn't totally necessary and the flat AP goes great with his fantastic ratios.
I'm glad they were very up front about his chances as a write-in/3rd party. Ballot access is a total bitch and once June 29th passed that avenue was closed to Paul. 
I remember when yoyo'ing was THE thing to do when I was 11, 12? I bought this cool as hell yo yo and thought I would be the most popular kid in school. Turns out, I have no coordination and the only thing I could do was wind that shit up after I majestically mess up.   This guy is, in my eyes, the 11 year old I wish I could have been.   I want to get him a multicolored LED yo yo and bring him to a rave. 
I was expecting you to say "Oh, but it's a *dry* heat" haha. Arizona does have beautiful mild winters...But I'm still not sure it's worth the skin melting summers for ghostly pale people like me!
He and Valsecchi will get into F1 next year. Valsecchi will get some higher pay driver seat like a Williams or a Lotus (Grosjean is a pay, right?), and Razia will get something like a Marussia or an HRT seat. With Perez MAYBE taking Massa's seat, we might see Esteban Gutierrez in a Sauber seat. Kamui is (most likely) there to stay if no one offers him anything big, so don't count it being a Perez-Gutierrez team.
Depends. I was very active playing sports all year round. Now i cant play any so it was a big life changer. It led me into gaming and such. But today no, it doesnt prevent me from doing anything and lift 5 days a week
This
It isn't Flobots' best work at all, and you may have heard it a million times by now since it is their mainstream hit, but its message is clever and relevant, especially as I watch the US slowly become a police state.
The only way to adapt is to shut up and let them have a contest of either 'impress the werewolf' or 'see who can do the first random thing'.  Every time I disagreed ('I don't like the werewolf who said he eats people, doesn't want to be helpful, and has confessed to being under the influence of a demon and I don't want to do what he says' or 'shouldn't we go back to town and try to save someone from being murdered?') it turned into 'who can out argue and outshout who.  They got mad when I yelled at the werewolf just so my character was told a plot point.  I gave up for a month and the only choices I made on my own are setting a talking snake on fire, agreeing to protect another player's character from the random person stealing shit, and jumping into a portal I didn't know where it went.  If my character were taken out of the story entirely, the only thing that would have changed would be the evil snake was never set on fire after it was killed and halfway eaten.  I don't want him to do things because he's my fiance, I want him to be a good GM and this party to compromise, listen, trust, and not lie.  They shoved a murder victim under a porch and tried to take his shoes.  I didn't care since hey, we were in town and doing something with the actual plot.
I went to college with a girl who grew up on the same block Fred Rogers lived on. She said he's actually just like he seems on his TV show.
Ground seal is surprising to see.
It sounds to me like your husband does not know his own church's doctrine very well. Which is not necessarily a bad thing-- a lot of people grow up in the church and never learn much about what the doctrine really teaches or its history. Or even the reasons behind the "rules" like caffeine. In the end that might be a good thing. Might mean very little exposure to the actual history might start him thinking. It also might mean he's just culturally invested in the lifestyle and doesn't really care about the doctrine or understanding why he lives by the rules he does. Maybe you should start by asking him "if the church wasn't true, would you want to know?" and gauge his investment in the doctrine vs. his family/social life in the church.
He didn't write the bill.
Using this [sample size calculator](http://www.nbrii.com/our-process/reports/sample-size-calculator/), 255 responses would be needed for valid data. So 202 are more than enough.
Because automation is going to so radically change the landscape. It will, very soon, become cheaper to automate anything then to hire an employee. Machines incur none of the costs/complications that employees do. There is a one time up front cost, then years of flawless accuracy. If people are no longer being paid to produce goods to be consumed, then they are no longer able to afford to continue to consume those goods. Something has got to give.  Not to mention that once additive manufacturing really takes off, we'll have the ability to simply print whatever we want (including: 3D printers)... So I'm sure you can imagine how that goes. You can simply exponentially increase you're production capability until it is sufficient to achieve whatever goal you've set.  There are a lot of different ways such a thing could go down. It might be peaceful, it might be bloody, it might be politically, it might be grassroots... Who knows. But one thing is pretty much certain: Automation is going to throw a great big wrench in the current way of doing things.
the answer is 42.. and bacon 42 pieces of bacon TIME WARP! 
[Exactly](http://www.bloomberg.com/news/2012-05-18/world-s-richest-lose-33-billion-as-facebook-debut-stalls.html)
I literally laugh-farted from this.
A cheese stake made me happy now I'm back in my basement lights off no one to call no one to give a damn about me, wana be friends?
I'm sure he felt better when you reminded him that Peyton Manning is better than he'll ever be.
Not political-correctness, just correctness. Dictionary definition has nothing to do with politics.
Just kidding, my bad.  Nope, they haven't mentioned who can use them, so for now, Space Marines have no access to flakk missiles.
The Top Gun approach is always awesome. I served as a wing man for a friend of mine hitting on a random girl at a house party a few years ago. They recently got engaged.  For you young whippersnappers unfamiliar with Top Gun, one of the greatest cinematic achievements of the 1980s, and all time, the Top Gun approach works like [this](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=HVNWSEX-WqU).
Can I put in a request? A comic of D-Bryan and CM Punk in a match at a PPV. The Spin: the only people in attendance are those that are vegans and/or straight edge. (i.e. 15 people in a 20k+ stadium)
You are the chosen one.
Is toast plural for toast?
fuck slasher!
In this incident, I agree that power may not have helped, but maybe he'd have caught a lighter bike. I've caught mine on a down and prevented any dents/dings. Mine's not a 250 but it's still not A: a supersport ridiculously-powerful thing which I'll end up in a tree on, nor a huge litre+ machine I can't lift.  It's not just reddit that says it, man. I was flat out forbidden from ever riding my XS750 by my sister, and after realizing what a ridiculously powerful bike that was for a beginner, I am inclined to agree.
When I was about 4 my dad had surgery to remove his colon/large intestine, and kept asking him why they couldn't take his small intestine instead. This was because in my books about the human body the large intestine was always pink so i preferred it over the yellow small intestine.  Also, I pictured the surgery happening in a rusty shed with saws and them hanging his colon around the room like fairy lights.  TL:DR=young me asked dad to change his lifesaving surgery to preserve his colon because i thought it was pink
Were you also selling a stack of red plastic cups, or do my eyes deceive me?
I take it you've never played the Katamari Damacy games?
I would personally rather vote the "you can't prove there is no god" a freebie. That's the shit *I* hear every time. But yeah, in all honesty, at least 25% of them could be a freebie just as well.
Well he could make it fun.
As was mentioned below, He **will** need to replace the brakes, I remember we used to call them death grips, suicide levers or turkey wings, and for a darn good reason; The upper levers will never stop you dead, Best they'll do is slow you down and not very well.
We're not at war with China. We've been winning the arms race with them for 70 years. Sure, they've been closing the gap in the past 20-30 years, but it's still hardly a competition. There will always been certain tensions, but our economies are far too reliant on each other for any sort of war. Your "fact" is unsupported. 200 nautical miles? (by the way, it's not a common usage term so you should type it out) China wouldn't provoke the US by sailing carriers so close to the US borders. They are completely aware of the US's complete air superiority. While f-22's are a giant waste of money, the US has still been investing in them for years because they are the dogfighters that keep any sort of foreign power from even considering aerial assaults on the US. Plus we have unmanned drones which we can and do make by the buttload. And, again, China doesn't want war. Maybe in 20-30 years, when oil is running a lot lower and is a lot pricier, if alternative energy investments haven't proved fruitful, but now? No way. Chinese politicians like staying in power, just like US politicians, and they all know that war with each other would be disastrous at this juncture.  And personal insults really don't support your argument. Might as well just type "ad hominem". Especially if you're going to invoke the word "logic". You haven't stated a single fact. You've stated your suspicions, but without any sort of backup.
Im thinking they came up with some crazy sob story about why you only come in for one beer and one game. Or they just see you as a usual and treat you to some freebies.
[K-9](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/K-9_%28film%29) when his dog gets shot, and he carries him into the hospital, and talking to him in the PACU. That gets me every single time!
I'll try :P
A solid 8.  Would not kick out of bed for eating crackers.
:DDD Thank you so much. Really. I really appreciate you doing this. I owe you a cookie.
Everything else on that list became superfluous once you mentioned the Mashovel.
UCLA MAPS? Could you fill me in with more information on how you found a doctor to shadow and etc? Thanks
While Ayurveda originated pre-modern scientific methodology you might be suprised by its contriutions to modern medicine. For example the grandfather of modern surgery [Sushruta](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sushruta_Samhita) wrote about plastic surgery like rhinoplast, cataract surgery, puncturing to release fluids in the abdomen, extraction of foreign elements, treatment of anal fistulas, setting fractures, amputations, cesarean sections and stitching of wounds, all in the 3rd century CE. As Ayurveda is over 5000 years old (the oldest continually practiced medicine in the world) as you can imagine much knowledge was learned by observation and trial and error. Regardless, when studied it holds up remarkably well as an evidence based medicine. Even if the evidence wasnt originally a double blind study. Also keep in mind that if you cant patent something, for example an herb, there is less financial resources to properly studying it. In any case you may want to do some more research on published studies before completely writing it off. I listed a few places below to get started.   [International Journal of Ayurveda Research](http://www.ijaronline.com/) [Ayurvedic Research on National Institutes of Health National Library of Medicine (AKA: Pubmed)](http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed?term=ayurveda)  [International Journal of Research in Ayurveda and Pharmacy](http://www.ijrap.net/) [Central Council for Research in Ayurvedic Sciences](http://www.ccras.nic.in/) [AYU (An International Quarterly Journal of Research in Ayurveda](http://www.ayujournal.org/) [Scientific Research from Maharishi Ayurveda](http://www.mapi.com/maharishi_ayurveda/research/index.html) [Light on Ayurveda Journal](http://www.loaj.com/) [Journal of Ayurveda and Integrative Medicine](http://www.jaim.in/) [Ancient Science of Life](http://www.ayurvedajournals.org/scienceoflife/asl/index.php) [Journal of Clinical Rheumatology in Ayurveda](http://msd.ancientscienceoflife.org/) [Association of Ayurvedic Professionals of North America Research Papers](http://www.aapna.org/research.php) [California College of Ayurveda Ayurveda Research Papers](http://www.ayurvedacollege.com/articles/students/) [International Association of Yoga Therapists](http://www.iayt.org/)
Okay, firstly that's Riverfire (previously Lagoon Demacia) that you're looking at. I should know, I helped build a lot of it including the tower you're standing on. Secondly, it's been griefed more times than I can remember and we've rebuilt every single time. 
Let's face it, everything seems less threatening when you add an emoticon.  "I'm going to tear the head off an infant. :)"
If you give it time it will shrink back down. Tearing and having scar tissue would effect it, however. So childbirth CAN, yes. But having sex with a large penis is not going to permanently destroy it unless she was ripping herself up all the time. My guess is that they have to take it slow and be a bit more careful so as not to hurt her.
I love you a lot right now. And I don't care if they down vote me. People are so stupid when it comes to cars. My car would go 0-60 in 6.5 seconds. And it was stock except for no muffler. Just cats and pipes. I'm planning on getting this 2013 5.0 and hopefully another 05-09 V6 with the manual tranny. Throw some bolt ons and make a name for V6 mustangs around town as there aren't any modded V6's here in town and I got a lot of hate when I had mine.
I was at the recent Atlanta show - probably the best concert I've ever seen in my life and I've been going to shows since 77' or so...I have to admit, there were a couple of times (actually, more like 5 or 6 times) that I felt like I was getting weepy at the show.  It was an incredible emotional concert.
Makes it easier when you make your woman dress you for you.
They have come back and that is why I am upset about it.
"The question isn't whose going to let me, it's whose going to stop me."  One of my favorite quotes from Ayn Rand. Plus in regards to the quote and it's relation to bioshock I would highly recommend reading the book, very well written and quite fitting of the games universe.
It's just my opinion?
Where did I say "pure" capitalism? That's the folly too many make, thinking a complete lack of restriction, regulation, and oversight is the way to go.  You realize capitalism is responsible for the affluence in just about every developed country in the world, right? The problems start happening when the system is *allowed* to be abused, which is only a particularly bad problem in the US. All capitalism means is that companies compete with one another to earn your business. In most, but not all industries, this is only a good thing when, **as most of the rest of the world does**, abuses of the system are kept in check.  You wouldn't be using so much of the technology you are now if it weren't for capitalism, as that competition is a huge motivation for companies to sink a ton of money into R&amp;D.
This is probably the best idea I've heard in a while. Sorta like a book club, but with more meth and fat stacks.
Please do not upvote this trash.  Barry Cooper is a hack.  Once a cop, always a cop.  LEAP (Law enforcement against prohibition) will never endorse BC [again](http://www.leap.cc/leap-does-not-endorse-never-get-busted-again/).  For the record, BC was never a DEA agent.
Alright, let's give this a try!  1, Gravity Rush (Cart) -simply amazing. 2, Disgaea 3 (Cart) -150hrs played so far... 3, BlazBlue CSE (Cart) -visual novel + successor to GuiltyGear? Yes. 4, Touch My Katamari (PSN) -Katamari Damacy~! 5, MGS HD Collection (PSN) -loved the originals, £20 on PSN! 6, Rayman Origins (Cart) -great, but haven't played it much! 7, MotorStorm RC (PSN) -fantastic little racer, good for pickup and play 8, Uncharted (Cart) -great game, played it start to finish, will replay it eventually 9, Plants vs Zombies (PSN) -I admit I love this game, vita version is the best one 10, Wipeout 2048 (PSN) -fantastic racer, I suck at it though! 11, Unit 13 (PSN) -got a code from Sony so it cost £13.49, haven't played it past the tutorial, but it was very "nice" to play, great feeling controls, if that makes sense! 12, Super Stardust Delta (PSN) -neat little shooter, felt like an iOS game really. Nice time waster! 13, Frobisher Says (PSN) -good game, but you need to be in the right place (some games need light, others are AR based, etc) 14, Mutant Blobs Attack (PSN) -haven't actually played this yet, but it was in the sale! Looks great though!  And I forgot I had one more:  15, Ultimate Marvel vs Capcom 3 (PSN) -I *loved* MvC2 on the Dreamcast, but I can't get on with this, it feels empty somehow. It has Phoenix Wright in it though, so a bonus point there!  In comparison, my 3DS games (Mario Kart 7 was lent to a friend): http://i.imgur.com/VwQa1.jpg  The Vita has no games though, right?
I am overwhelmed with the response.  Thank you all.   My goal is to improve, so I welcome your comments.  I'm not sure how all this works, so, it may take awhile for me to become knowledgeable in the in's and out's of Reddit!  I will take my camera off auto!!!  More to come!!  Thanks!
He also supported Spanish nationalists, no amount of cats and melting watches makes him a good man.
Leafy greens like kale and chard are great, too. I never thought I'd lose weight eating eggs and avocado and nuts all day! Nutrient dense foods really help with satiety. Upping my water intake and cutting out juice and soda helped, too! I lost 65 lbs of pregnancy weight eating like this in huge amounts while breastfeeding and I didn't do any exercise but stroller pushing.
I think you have a bigger problem. Your legs are backwards.
I just watched this last night. :(
Thanks for the help and advice. I was an IAS Darts guy, and the IAS nerf caused me to reroll WZ, but I'm back on my WD now. And yeah, things like imp packs are crushing me. I'm finding it funny...I die more to certain trash packs when my CD's are up than I do on most (except combos like fast or elite wallers) elite packs. Appreciate what you did.
As a guy, I guess I just see the references to /r/gonewild, /r/ketogonewild, /r/ladyboners, etc... in response to sexy progress shots from both genders as being intended as compliments, rather than simply harassment. A sleazy/rude compliment's still a compliment, and IMO is still a positive change from what's typically said about the bodies of overweight/obese people.   With that said, I try my best to make my compliments on hot progress pictures as classy &amp; inoffensive as possible, so as to avoid coming off as some sort of perv. Regardless, the thought "I'd love to see her naked" is likely still there under the surface. 
Sometimes it's during aswell 
We weren't aware where we were till two very formally dressed guards come out with crew cuts and guns on their hips and tell us very politely to leave the premises. Actually it was the nicest i've ever been kicked out of a place.
Does he drink that stuff a lot? And do you work for Coke?
Canadian here too, Its currently 76 in the house with the AC on, and I find it a tad cold for my liking. Granted it is 100 outside right now. I guess everything is relative.
probably not, but im not to sure.
Same for me. Spending about 4 hours on it without succes.
That's just courtesy to the guests. It's how you should sit as a couple during formal occasions.
The lucidity was maybe a 7? I knew it was a dream because I made her appear. But I think if I was fully conscious I would have attempted more interesting things.   And idk, I only have enough swag to bang girls, literally, in my dreams. sooo. =/
I think the legislation also requires that messaging services/social networks retain this data as well.  So Google UK would be legally required to comply regardless of the encryption methods used to contact their servers (providing the sender or recipient was accessing Gmail from within the UK)
Ive received oral sex from 2 female coworkers. No context there, im just fucking awesome. 
And since it came up organically, i can tell you that I had sex with Eartha Kitt in an airplane bathroom.
She was a 7/10, but these [girls are hotter](http://25.media.tumblr.com/tumblr_m6cbjwK9kH1qf24tho1_1280.jpg)
Actually, I was going to post something hilarious and then kind of strayed, but I kept hilarious there anyway because *there's nothing wrong with a little humor goddamnit.*  The word should be: *awesome*.
Dr. Blendalo, EE
Reminds me of Mad Max
A-HA!
Alright, now put your nose in my blowhole
I am terribly sorry for how you're family has treated you friend. As a fellow lesbian I know the trials of parents discovering your sexuality. I live in Canada and I have been lucky to have been born here. Coming out wasn't easy, but I was never forced to change.   Currently I am in love with a girl from the United States. Her parents are not taking the fact that she is bisexual too well. It is preventing us from being together.   Even if you do move to the west, the trials will continue but they won't be nearly as severe. If you come to Canada, I suggest you live in a place like Toronto or Vancouver and its suburbs. Both those areas are very gay friendly. Hey, you can even marry here!  If you find yourself heading to this country make sure to send me a message on here. If you're coming to Toronto, I'll welcome you.
I like PER, but is Pittman better than Anthony? 
While that's good for a 9 game span, that's way too small of a sample size to warrant anything more than prospects in a trade.
I always say "OH MAN, I know the best knock knock joke" they're always like "oh okay? what is it?"  then I get excited and say "okay okay, you start"  BAM. I get them.
I have 3 kids. I hired a very nice woman for $10/hr (plus we put her on our cell plan, and she is welcome to our kitchen). we pay roughly $350 a week, and I LOVE HER TO DEATH. She cleans for me to, just cuz she says she wants to be helpful. Also, daycare centers in most place, especially the south run $100 or less if you have multiples. Most are $125 here in New Hampshire, but reduce the rate significantly for multiples. So.. if you're paying $800 a week for 2 kids like the article says... you're a fool. 
My oldest does that too. Usually when she wants me to love on her. I'll come home and walk in front of me, throw herself on the ground and role over like that. Cute kitty. 
Fun fun.  I play with a very competitive group and the Tau FAQ has a hole in it in reference to Target locks and who still gets them that is sure to cause issues.  
I imagine it would feel... Satisfying.
Much better. 
So fluffy!  ohmygawdCUTE.  :D
I have found a solution to this problem, protein bars 
Just make sure there's plenty of room for activities
Loudest thing in the house? Your disposal is either broken, got something jammed in it, or is older than dirt.  Mine has a nice quiet purr to it. 
Are you a hooker?
As long as he finds a way to work "tittie" into every one.
But to be fair, if you have ever Googled the most common questions people usually want answered your first search results are almost always Yahoo! Answers, random forums, 3-5 of those weird Q&amp;A sites and Wikipedia.
I'm sorry, but I have 47 urgent tickets to respond to. Yours is 48th. I'll get back to you tomorrow.
Hm.. if you kept them in a bigger pen, poop wouldn't be such a problem anyway. I realize these are not exactly your pets and there are space issues, and it's better than buying stuff from the supermarket, but still. I think you should keep them as happy as possible.  Ah, ignore my ramblings.. I don't know anything about quails. It just seems that they ought to have more space and solid ground and some grass or something?
I can't even think about the winters in Canada! I had the idea that every house there had really good heating (you should hear Canadians complain about our poor insulation and inadequate heaters when they visit Australia!)  I had to read up about Raynauds, thanks for the link. What a worry that must add to everything else. Hooray for handwarmers!
My body does that every time I hear the OP song
Oh no, opinions of me from people I don't care about! Give me your karma and be on your way.
I'll do my best to explain this.  But if you get confused by any numbers, go straight to the bold conclusions.  Looking at budget numbers: In 2000, we spent $1.79 trillion we got $2.03 trillion in taxes.   In 2012, we are projected to spend $3.80 trillion and get $2.47 in taxes.  ([source](http://www.whitehouse.gov/sites/default/files/omb/budget/fy2013/assets/hist.pdf))  Said another way, **over 13 years, we're spending 112% more than we used to.  We're also only bringing in 22% more money now than we did in 2000.**  As a percentage of the economy:  In 2000, our spending was 18.2% of the economy, and we taxed 20.6% of the economy. In 2012, our spending is planned to be 24.4% of the economy, and taxes 15.8% of the economy.  Said another way, **over 13 years, spending has grown by 6.2% of the economy.  Taxes have shrunk by 4.8% of the economy.**   As for what things were spent on, as a percentage of spending:      2000   2012  Defense     16%    18.8%  Medicare    12%    14.8%   Medicaid    6.6%   6.9%  Social Security   22.9%  20.2%  Now remember, spending has shot up 112%.  Those four programs took up roughly three-fifths of our spending in 2000, and they take up roughly three-fifths of our spending in 2012.  Said another way, **these 4 programs have grown consistently as spending has grown.  All are at fault to blame for the rise in spending, some only slightly more than others.**  As for tax changes,  In 2001 and 2003, there were two rounds of Bush tax cuts.  In 2009, Obama pushed the stimulus, which cut taxes further, and those temporary tax cuts have still been continued until today. Those are the major changes in the tax code. To see these changes, look at taxes as a percentage of the economy:         2000   2002   2004   2006   2008   2010   2012  % of economy   20.6%  17.6%  16.1%  18.2%  17.6%  15.1%  15.8%  You can see these numbers dip in response to new tax cuts.  You can also see them dip and rise according to the economy.  For example.   In 2000, taxes were high, and the economy was in a bubble state.  In 2004 they dropped after two Bush tax cuts.  In 2006 the economy was good, and tax money was back to historical averages.  By 2010, Obama's tax cut hit, plus the economy was bad. **Overall conclusion:  There is no single, easy thing to blame.  Spending has shot way up, taxes have gone way down (though not by as much as spending has shot up).  Major budget programs are all growing as spending is growing.  Also, it's also harder to compare a bubble year of 2000 to a recovery year like 2012.  (Incidentally, wars are blamed in the comments.  War spending as a percentage of the budget is surprisingly small.  During the worst years of Afghanistan and Iraq war spending, it contributed to roughly 5% of federal spending.  Today, it's much lower as Afghanistan is winding down and we aren't militarily in Iraq.)**
Actually I'd dump her if she wasn't willing to get a little dirty and sweaty with me.  Today we went swimming in a lake and then rented a canoe.  Tomorrow we'll go for a hike on the Appalachian trail.  Next weekend, motorcycles.  A girlfriend who doesn't share my need to be out enjoying life in all its sweaty, dusty, wet, mud encrusted and bug infested glory is not a woman I want to spend my life with.  :)
They would have quite a fight on their hands from, not just civilians, but businesses of all sizes, education sector, etc.  I don't think they could pull that one off. The only reason they are pulling this new thing off is because the general user does not know what is going on, let alone know what encryption really is. Governments are basically taking advantage of the ignorance that is their population. How can this change? Well, good question. I don't know that answer. It's easy to say, "Provide more tutorials and free documents on encryption and privacy". Or, "Teach the public about *why* we have privacy and anonymity in the first place; the people who died for our right to both." etc..  But really, people aren't interested until it directly involves them. 
Yep. I'm glad you drew (or bothered to find) this, because I also noticed DUELETHERNETbro's version was wrong, but I didn't have near enough energy to explain or demonstrate. Thank you.
Thank you. I'm just looking right now, Maybe something good will come up. I'm currently employed as an Executive Assistant and I really enjoy the work but I want something a little more rewarding. Preferably working with Project Management.
The Germans fought with mostly the standard rules of gentlymanly warfare, which is not that surprising given that it would have been what their top officers would have learned when they were trained to be officers (i.e. pre WWI).  Of course the standard rules of gentlemanly warfare also contains the standard exception -- when the enemy is not like us, meaning typically that he was not white, and in extreme cases that he was not WASP -- then the rules don't apply. Which is the why the Russians were treated the way they were by the Germans and why they fought back the way they did.
It's almost as disgusting as the cum box. I wonder what would happen if you tried to burn it... 
Wouldn't that horrifically maim you?
Your name is the funniest thing I've seen all day. Have an upvote!
&gt; there obviously does have to be a limit  With recreational drugs? Why?
I will try to say some series that have not been already mentioned.   **dark anime**: Berserk, Hellsing, higurashi no naku koro ni  **beautiful anime**: Kino's journey, mushishi  **large, adventure anime**: Eureka seven, FMA brotherhood, tengen toppa  **Funny**: cromartie high school, azumanga daioh, yakitate japan (anime about bread!), school rumble  If you liked Kaiji, you might like Akagi, it's made by the same people and is very similar in style. Before you start watching, you should first take a look at the riichi mahjong rules so you get what's happening. 
...thank you for this.
It's not only the potty training - raising a puppy is a full time job in many respects. If you want him to grow up and be an easy going adult the rule of thumb is meeting 4 new people everyday, and lots of dogs, new objects, etc. A puppy who is crated 8 hours a day is likely to have potty training issues as well as socialization issues unless you are a super hero socializer when you get home.  An older dog would likely be fine alone for the day.
No, you build a panther out of a VT-55 chassis, and then you charge $150,000 for it.  http://www.site.ww2mv.com/Panther_Replica_For_Sale.html  It's pretty much identical.
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/David_Lodge_%28voice_actor%29  Naruto, WoW, Diablo 3, one of my favorites :)
Russia vs. Czech Republic was an exciting game.  Great to see Arshavin play like his old self.  Dzagoev was fantastic pretty much all 3 games for Russia, shame they didn't advance.  
I usualy dont show emotions but I did get abit teird eye during that episode. Iv accualy been to some concentration camp museum when i was a kid. I only realy remember a gigantic pile of shoes. I dident realy understood it then, I do now...
I know you claim you are trying to explain why homeschooling extremely harmful to kids and basically useless as far as education goes, but it sounds more like you are bragging about your academic accomplishments. So let me brag about mine.  I was homeschooled my whole life until I started taking college classes. In my high school years I was part of a teenage research program that taught me computer science and advanced college level math (discrete math) AND got me published in a scientific journal before I turned 18. I started community college full time at 16 after taking the High School exit exam. So I agree that most parents can't teach AP calc or AP physics, but a community college teacher can. Maybe unschooling students would object to that, but many homeschoolers I knew did the same. I didn't take the SAT. I didn't take any AP tests. So how did I get into a top 25 university you ask? I worked my butt off getting my GE and major classes done before applying as a physics major. I ended up switching to math and graduated a few years later with a degree in pure mathematics. To boot, I saved money by going to a community college. So despite your preconceived notions about homeschooling, it is quite possible to do well in that situation.  All that being said, I completely agree that there are problems with homeschooling. It is much harder get enough social interaction, but some parents do a great job at filling in those gaps in a variety of ways. It's also possible for the kids to have gaps in certain areas. But I work closely with the local school system which is in a well off area and home to two highly ranked high schools. Let me tell you that these students often have gaps in their knowledge as well, especially when it comes to math. Are there kids that take AP Calc BC in high school? Of course. As you said, brilliant minds will succeed anyway. But there are also tons of kids that are failing out of Algebra 2 in droves because the middle school teachers taught for tests and not for understanding. I'm not going to tell you that homeschool is without flaw. I've seen plenty of kids come out of homeschooling homes barely knowing algebra, but keep in mind that the same thing happens in publics school, even in nicer areas.  I forgive you for your ignorance and close-mindedness. But before you run your mouth next time, consider the possibility that you judged a whole slew of people prematurely and unfairly in a single post.
"how she doesn't like when she and i are in an empty house"  "And now my mom feels like i dont give a fuck about what she says"  Did she actually forbid you from having your friend in with you?   From reading your post there doesn't seem to be anything for you to feel bad about since you did nothing wrong. I don't think you fucked up, the onus is on your mother for not listening to and believing you - you haven't put either of them through anything. Stop over-reacting, go explain to your mother what you were doing, all you can do is try and make her see the truth. If that doesn't work then you've done all you can - I suspect due to the way you're handling this you don't misbehave or whatever and so she should believe that you wouldn't do something like this.
Oh, I completely agree.  I was just arguing that it wasn't really a "fan theory," just a classification of the movie's genre.
&gt;EDIT: someone send me the article saying that we can save $72 billion by ending the tax exemption for Religious Institutions.  The govt doesn't 'save' that way. It would just be taking from churches and spending that money. &gt;so do you totally get rid of food stamps if it's up to you?  Yes. The people in your community are responsible for feeding them.   &gt;how much money does this save?  $71 billion at the federal level. http://abcnews.go.com/blogs/politics/2011/05/congress-mulls-cuts-to-food-stamps-program-amid-record-number-of-recipients/   &gt;Do you think getting rid of food stamps should be the #1 priority in saving money or getting new revenue?  Getting revenue. But not with higher taxes. And the govt "saves" nothing. it only takes. The only people that get to save are the people taxed less by the govt.  &gt;I want to know because my post was assuming that there would be better ways to save more money and with less negative side-effects (as i imagine them).  &gt;do you see a corresponding, if this is done, increase in crime and therefore police and jails and the money spent on them? if not - why not?   Well, since we have far more selfish Liberals that think charity is the govt's job and not theirs and other Liberals that think that the rich stole from them in some fashion and think they are entitled to the property of others, yeah, crime will probably increase. 
Crime and low test scores among the black population are a result of poverty. Unfortunately, when you grow up in poverty, you tend to have a much lower quality of education. It turns into a vicious cycle, and few manage to escape it. This does not mean that black people are less intelligent. In fact, in different parts of the world, the degree of poverty is significantly reduced, and more black people tend to be successful.  I'll admit bias, though - I'm dating a black 4.0 college student who grew up in one of the worst areas in Compton.
&gt;your anger is only hurting you  Actually, it's hurting the racist Zionist cause, which is the entire intent.  BTW, spare me Freudian platitudes. Nothing says "Useful Idiot" like aping Jewish pop psychology.
Beautiful animal
I am level 30, having over 2k normal games... i'm starting to learn smartcast .. T_T
manly tears are being shed because of this story.  I WANT A HORSIE!
It would depend on the kind of work we needed.  We have worked with 99 designs, and that worked well, but it is structured to protect both parties pretty well.  The challenge is not knowing the other person (and that goes both ways).  If we were able to define a clear task, and clear milestones, it might work.  But something significant like hiring a partner, or bringing on someone in a complex role - no way.  That would require a lot of face to face time to get comfortable with the person.
[This for my voice](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=QvC9fHiIX8I&amp;feature=plcp)  Ted Williams to the second question.
Yeah, try any of my famous over/under cooked meals.
[&amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;](http://theeharshreality.files.wordpress.com/2010/07/keep_it_real.jpg)
I'm sorry, but in my experience English-speaking Countries have some of the most bland and least imaginative cuisine in the world. Looking at the pictures in this article didn't really diminish that impression. 
Always been a fan of [this image.](http://media.tumblr.com/tumblr_lf3ig5Sprj1qdvslo.jpg)
Not sure what your discipline is or how that affects things, but from a Biomedical Engineering perspective, I've never heard of someone paying for a Ph.D. If you can convince the school to let you in the program, it's a full ride. It's a bit trickier to get just an M.S. and have the school pay for it, but it's not unheard of.
1953. Though I'm surprised it didnt kick off again with that sinking of the South Korean ship recently.  Talk about restraint, I'm fairly sure they 50 crew.
No.  But that's just my guess.
When i was younger we didnt do much for christmas except go vist some distint realtives (were i was born) and  then on christmas day i got some not great gifts ( cloths and a digital Yayzte game ) so i was a little miffed so my dad tells me that i dint get much cuz of the $ situation, so fastforward to a week we r back in florida and there like stay in ur room for sec out blue and the led me 2 one of the out of the room and the sits a new bike , a ps2, and one of those paper jams giutar, that made my Christmas Tl,dr Gets so-so gifts for x mas, come home 2 new bika nd ps2
It's an impressive display of DJ ability, but not so good as a song.
It is a biscuit in the American sense. And biscuits with sausage gravy is glorious, BTW.
Thank you!
I replied to somebody who was complaining they couldn't find work in a similar fashion.  They actually sent me their resume.  It needed a total makeover and had errors all over the place.  The close friends who had looked at it probably said "yeah, looks good" when it was anything but.   I'm guessing OP could probably use some help there, too (from somebody who has experience and actually cares enough to critique and be honest). 
Leela is one of my favorites as well. possibly my favorite from the whole classic series (haven't seen them all yet). 
Poor Best.kz :(
1996 here. the only thing that excites me about the 90s is grunge, which I discovered many years after I was born, obviously
Generally speaking, .gov entities do not use homegrown PKI for public sites. 
Depends. Is this server room designed for a party of 4-6 characters of levels 6-8? Then yes.
When I was level 10, I would go top lane with a friend with double exhaust and ignite and hide in the bush closest to the enemy turret to try to get first blood.  When I was level 10, if you had a skin, you were a god.  When I was level 10, if someone did really good against you with a champ, I had to play it next game. (Still sorta do)  When I was level 10, people played Xerath.   When I was level 10, Trynd op.  When I was level 10, I played akali and bought all her skins because i thought bloodmoon and nurse were sexy as fuck. ???
Eliminating all social programs, in addition to widespread availability and acceptance of abortion should solve a lot of the problems. The poor will delay having children until they have a stable financial situation.   I admit you cannot just stop social programs, you have to ween the country off of them. 
If you live a bad life, you end up in /b/
That's a bit of a relief.  I don't know if he's the same way as you of course, but I can definitely be friends with someone who is attracted to me (or that I'm attracted to) and have it be positive.  Thank you for the input!
rope
Yeah the Austin Zoo has a whole exhibit of wolf hybrids... owners think "hahah I wana own a wolf!!" then get WAYY in over their heads, and the poor animal has no place to go, so the zoo started adopting them and lets them join their ever growing pack at the zoo.  I guess you can say all's well that ends well, but it's pretty sad that people do this shit.
Well, yeah but that was because Christ had to die. From a practical point of view too many things could have gone wrong in the garden if violence had broken out....Peter the rock could have been killed or Christ could have been cut down. It make's sense in that instance that the lamb should of been led to the slaughter. 
And this is a confession?  Feels more like an excuse to repost an old joke in a new format. &amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
Anything by Death Cab For Cutie. I love how the meaning of their songs can change over time for anybody.
&gt;No renewing the Bush tax cuts is another tax he's done.  Why does almost every far-right conservative sound like a fucking idiot?
I know of a (magical) place that only asks 50cents for a cup of black and 1 refill. Infinity refills if you're ninja, but at that price I really don't mind the pay up.
Why? With the socks? I don't get it.  Is this normal in Sweden?
Two tap movement is on my radar.  I've seen someone play for the first time and he struggled since drag and drop didn't seem intuitive to him.
BBC Radio 1 has an excellent program. I listen to a live stream from the US, and that's how I find most of my dub.
Movies are a more visual medium, I can see why they went that route.
This is an amusing card, but not a great expy- again, if not for the name and the flavor text (and the name of the counter), nothing about the card screams 'Homer'.  It doesn't come across in the mechanics, but in everything-but-the-mechanics.
The best way to go about this is probably getting all your generic tools first, for instance:   * Breaker bar. * Generic metric box set 1/4 3/8 &amp; 1/2 ratchets &amp; sockets &amp; some extentions. * A generic set of metric wrenches (if you get a set of ratcheting ones have a set of standered open ended/box end ones too).  * A set of line wrenches.  * 2 or 3 sizes of vice grips.  * 3/8 1/2 inch torque wrenches. * Volt meter. * Flat and philips screw drivers (of varying lengths and sizes), pliars. * 2 or 3 pry bars in varrying sizes. * Floor jack and set of 4 jack stands.  You may already posess a number of these tools.  The reason for getting a set of generic wrenches/ratchets instead of, lets say, Snapon is if you manage to break/loose one you can go out and get a whole other set of wrenches for less than the price of a snapon wrench, (Snapon does have a lifetime warrenty on their tools, but if its lost or stolen you are SOL)  After this get the tools you need for a specific job as they come. (pressure tester, ball joint popper, belt tentioner tools) Tools that have a specific job that you may never need unless you are doing that job.  Finaly, if you have decided that you realy enjoy working on your own cars you should get an air comressor, air tank, hoses and some air powered tools as you need/want them.  Now, if you find yourself getting older, lazier, or richer you can always get a hydrolic portable scizor lift. I don't have a picture of mine on hand but they basicaly lay flat on the ground, you drive a car over them, put the arms on the jack points and press a button on the hydrolic motor and it lifts the car up to about 3ft off the ground. They are nice for a standard garage. But not necissary in any sense.  Hope this pointed you in the right direction.
Thank you.  All is right with the world noe.  damn.....
A great buy, you won't regret it.  Well, the razor came [with the wisteria handle](http://www.reddit.com/r/wicked_edge/comments/uh78n/feels_good_every_time/), used it for a couple months and then i figured there MUST be moisture collecting under the handle. Carefully then I removed the handle and there it was, slight brown spots that could develop to rust.  I cleaned the razor with soap and toothpaste, gave it a good strop and looked like new again (bought this razor about 4 months ago, so it's fairly new). I used it for sometime without the grip, but i wanted to see if i could get creative with it. Found some leather strips and thin rope and carefully rolled them to place.  In a couple of months i'm gonna have to check again for spots, maybe i'll change strip color since that's what i had handy at the moment. looks alright i think, i like green. Red all the way would be better, that's coming next. ;)
Just to keep the fear down: I still haven't seen anything unusual on any of my company's Linux servers (which include several Debians and RHEL6), and we're on GMT+2 so we should have been ahead of this.
it's like a cozy hug.
How does the Steinheil feel versus the naked screen? I haven't found a protector that feel anywhere as smooth.   And 30 bucks? For real? 
I'd second all of these points.   For keeping up on the literature most journals have lists you can subscribe to to get their tables of contents as they come out. I have my email rules setup to sort all of those into a folder I can go through when I have time, that way if it comes out in a journal I'm monitoring I never miss it.   The other piece of advice I have, and I can't stress this enough it to start writing early &amp; often. Write *everything* down and backup everything often. My favorite phone apps are a notepad &amp; a voice recorder. Editing is way easier than drafting.
No, that bundle is PSU-heavy.  You need graphical horsepower and the only way you're going to be able to get decent frame rates is if you purchase a mid-range card or higher. I'm talking about HD6870s, GTX560s, and GTX560Tis. Anything higher and you'll probably be CPU-bottlenecked.  Can you check the specs of your current power supply?
I'll see if I can...she tries to stay away from the internet as much as she can. Also for a 90 year old, she is EXTREMELY busy. She says that her constant activity is the number 1 reason why she is still in great physical condition.
Yeah, we used to love it when people added nothing to the conversation. I miss those days.
I thought that if you swore in chat and got reported for it you would be banned.
That's alright... I'm sure other people have some
I would come in with my Hammer pants and a killer fade and do a spinning slam dunk into a basketball hoop that just happened to be there while Bel Biv Devo's "Poison" plays in the background. As I complete the dunk, everything will go slow motion and I will hang from the rim and stare her down like the bad ass I am.   When she tried to break it off with me, I stop her mid-sentence with some cutting tell-off and then proceed to Roger Rabbit out of the restaurant to MC Hammer's "2 Legit 2 Quit" and hop into a fly ass hoopty full of honeys and ride off.
I marathon shows when they are good, and when it is over to extend the feel of it for a while i try my hand at learning a song or two of the ost on piano. When I finally learn it, I want to watch it again to hear the song in the show.
Your comment is so fucking cute it should be on the front page of /r/aww
No! Not at all! She is beautiful with or without doing all of that. I love her either way! 
I was about to make a list but then I stopped, one of my first thoughts was Final Fantasy 10 (as it happend to be a personal favourite of mine when it was released) and then I realized that it wasn't made in the last decade...  Now I feel so very old, thanks a lot!
remember to present it as a compliment!...
Do you even know what liberal means? You base your philosophy off of libertarian thought. Which was inspired by "liberal" thinkers. 
It makes me wonder if the whole thing was a publicity stunt by Taco Bell themselves. Relatively cheap way to get a lot of good PR without looking like you're paying for it.
And the first thing you need to know about vaginas. Add a condom wearing peeper and you got some slip and slide action.
The middle one is like: oh noes  The one in the left top corner is like: OMFG MY EYE IS MELTINGGGGGGHNNNNGGGGAAAAAAAHHH!
It would really depend on your input library - I think XNA ( for example ) supports multiple keyboards at the very least, though I haven't used that functionality before.
Three doctors and $600 later, and I'm on heavy antibiotics, plus using ibuprofen, benadryl, and ice packs for the pain/discomfort. The bloodwork can't be done for another two weeks because the Lyme antibodies can take awhile to show up.   Fuck ticks.
Brooks are actually low quality running shoes but a better bang for your buck than competing 50 dollar runners
Well, on one end... plastic surgeon happened. Damn, Africa!
I really wish my body wasn't like this, but about half of the time when I'm coming home my body starts thinking "Oh we're almost home! There's a bathroom at home...better prep the plumbing now" and I'll have to go to the bathroom really badly when I'm a couple minutes away from home. I think there might be a name for that specific kind of thing, but I can't remember what it's called.  The same thing happens if you're really tired though. Your body is like "We're close to home now and that's where our bed is! Time to get really sleepy!" and a lot of the cases where a person falls asleep driving is when they're within something like 10 miles of their house or so. Again, not 100% sure on the details, but I've heard about it a couple times before.
Meh, it's not nearly as bad as it looks.  I have one vein in my arm that's huge, and great, and full of blood. Easiest thing to stick an IV in. The problem is, the second they flush it, it blows. Half of my forearm is covered in bruise the next day, and people look at me like I'm the most abused child ever.  Bruises from giving blood look awesome, but they're not nearly as bad as say, getting punched.
There's a few things to remember here: 1) Reddit is naturally going to attract a certain "brand" of Christian. No I don't have numbers, but I think few would disagree. This is why we haven't seen photos of abortion clinics on fire with a Christian claiming responsibility and everyone applauding. 2) This is an open group, so those of other faiths or of no faith are welcome to join. Atheists, Mormons, etc can vote and influence things very, very easily, especially since there's a rather large contingency of atheists on Reddit and even in r/Christianity.
   / \   /   \  |  |  |  |  |  |   \  \/   /\  \  |  |  |  |  |  |   \   /    \ /
Awesome...
I tried to indoctrinate my girlfriend to use reddit... i failed (sorry, my leige, but in the process i got two of my friends to use reddit... so i brought 2 souls in compensation)  well, now everytime she sends me something from tumblr i reply with the same sentence:  wow! that so cute/awesome/weird/cool... you'll never guess where i saw it last month.
And feeding it to prisoners more then twice a week as ruled as cruel and unusual punishment.
Interesting.
Area is evacuated and cordoned off, nobody but the dude sitting in his house is in danger. Three hours in a situation like that is actually not bad at all. A situation like that can be treated in the same way as a major structure fire. Furthermore, borrowing resources from surrounding agencies is standard and accepted practice. *Especially* for extremely rare circumstances like the incident Truesday described. It's more cost effective, and the personel are better trained and have *real* experience. I come from a family of emergency first responders, and I know what I'm talking about. Sheriff Podunk does not need an LAV, nor does he need a $100,000 EOD bot and all the manpower and training it comes with. He *wants* it, but he doesn't *need* it to properly and competently serve your community.  A community of 30,000 people doesn't need a fully-equipped, paramilitary bomb squad anymore than Phoenix, Arizona needs an arctic rescue team. It's ridiculous.  But it sure looks fun to play with. That's why we have it in the game. ;-)
I know they are great guys, especially Salpi, but judging by the way this guy "speaks" greek it's obvious that this isn't him.
Bitch please, [that's](http://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/en/9/93/Planet_of_the_Ood.jpg) an Ood.
Works for me. I am free most week nights for a happy hour. And The Rusty Bucket has some amazing pineapple concoctions!
I hate the mandate, too, but this isn't really fair.  He wanted single-payer, but couldn't get it.  This was a backup, and is better than doing nothing (in his mind)
* Delete the deusex.exe and steamapi.dll file, then reverify the game cache  * Disable Cloud Sync entirely then relaunch the game  * Ensure Steam and the game are NOT running in compatibilty mode
The official Prometheus website contains a post on the message board that explains what David said. It's sourced from the linguist who actually came up with the language (who appears in the movie as the guy teaching David new languages).
/r/bestof 'd.
